New Bipartisan Legislation Would Repeal Trump’s Solar Tariffs: “I don’t know what good can possibly come as a consequence of stifling the growth of solar power.”

Good on these Congressmen for actually representing the best interests of their constituents rather than the bullshit agenda that is just hurting the country.
It's probably the same idea as the steel tariff. China has entered the US solar market and is steeply under cutting US solar panel manufacturers, which is easy to do when you pay slave wages.

Clearly, tariffs aren't the answer, but I can't blame people for wanting to try *something* to compete with China.

Edit: Before commenting, understand that I won't be replying to you.
The amount of pussy footing our Congress does with Chinese IP theft that ends up driving our companies out of business makes me think an investigation is needed in to their campaign finances. The Chinese may not be directly contributing, but I bet if we followed the money up stream, there would be billions getting to Congress from the Chinese to undermine American manufacturing.
There is a lot of misinformation spreading here, and it’s obvious this is a result of being a political hack. Companies can apply and ask for tariff’s through an appeals process if it is deemed a foreign exporter is selling well below market value. Which is exactly what was happening. China was flooding and undercutting the prices massively to a point where the US couldn’t compete. This was requested. Not the same as the most recent tariffs at all. 
The good would be allowing domestic solar manufacturing the financial ability to grow inside the US, as opposed to being reliant on imports from China and India, where environmental regulations are dog shit and labor laws can make you weep. Do you want to live in a world where we get most of our power from solar but have to endure the shame of knowing the ecological impact of how our power is produced because we know that China just dumps it's byproducts into rivers that flood the sea and kill marine life?

When a foreign country undercuts your domestic production by not following the same rules and standards, you apply a tariff to create a level playing field for all. Anyone pushing otherwise is speaking from a position of ignorance, or maliciousness.
The "good" is American Solar that can actually compete against American Oil. Most legislators know this which is why this bill won't go anywhere, notice how it's sponsors are all from safe districts and not ones potentially affected by foreign outsourcing.

Additionally as the article mentions at the end, Tariffs are only half the equation here. Trump did his trade actions based on national security concerns through existing laws. The new bill would have to strip him of that ability, a thing nobody is going to do because of security concerns.
Going Solar is good for the country, going Amercian made Solar is even better. China's unfair trade has been driving American solar out of business. Remember Solandra?
I'd bet $100 the legislation won't be enacted.

I'd bet $20 it won't even come up for a vote.
Tarrifs  may be needed to save the solar panel industry. There is no point in inventing and designing new products, if the Chinese companies steal the design and assemble it using slave-like conditions. It is impossible to be a fair business owner and compete with that.

I'm not read up enough on the issue to support either side, but this article is hopelessly biased.
Reading these comments I realize 90% of the commenters have no idea what these tariffs do and how they work. I hate trump too, but if you’re just gonna oppose an idea because he implemented it, than you’re just a partisan with no clue what’s going on.
This bill will ensure that China can continue to dump solar panels in our market for less than they cost until there is no domestic industry left.  We get some installation jobs still I guess.  Thankfully I don't think it has a chance to pass so its just a political stunt.
 So as someone who genuinely doesn't know why the tariffs were put in place in the first place, I feel like I just can't trust this article by itself. These people would do so much better of a job if they were to actually put things in context. 

Only people who are already biased are going to just take this at face value, you don't know anything about why the tariffs were put in place and so there's no way to evaluate if they are rational or not.

Again, I don't know about the tariffs, and so I'm not claiming to have an opinion either way as of right now. However I feel like I'm going to look into this only to realize that there is a solid reason for them being there in the first place.
This is because the US imports 3x the amount of solar equipment from China as the next closest trade partner. This has less to do with solar and more to do with regaining economic ground with China by attacking a sector that they've deemed important.
Easy the current powers that be make too much money from fossil fuels... it helps them 
China steals American intellectual property, uses essentially slave labor to make shitty knock offs, then sells them to the USA to undercut the businesses that are actually innovating in solar. Your blind, seething hatred of this guy is irrational. 

Also a week after he announced those solar panel tariffs China said they were going to open a plant in the US. lol
Great too bad it won't reach the floor in either house. 
American solar should be coming first
Calling these "Trump's tariff" is probably the most efficient way to indicate that you don't know anything about these tariffs, but that you don't like Trump.
Cutting off your nose to spite your face

From https://fas.org/sgp/crs/misc/IF10819.pdf

A relatively small share of the 260,000 solar jobs in the United
States is in manufacturing; most jobs are in the design, sales, and installation of solar systems. About 38,100 workers —
roughly 15% of all jobs in the solar industry — were employed in 
producing solar equipment


They arent stifling the growth of solar power. They are stifling the import of it, and in the process creating a ton of jobs, and laying the groundwork for US production of solar energy. That sort of competition (between china and the US in the manufacturing of solar power devices) would be _great_ for the growth of solar power, dont you think?
Stifling the growth of new technology is called sabotage by a 71 year-old man who isn't concerned about a future that doesn't involve him. 
350 jobs being brought back to the US in a struggling warehouse in the NW. You guys just hate America so much. 
"Clean, beautiful, coal.  Just beautiful."
What good?

LIBRUL TEARS - we can use them as fuel obviously /s
Bill Passes House > Bill Passes Senate > **Signed into law by President**
What good can come of it? Oh, I don't know, maybe building up our own Solar Power in this country instead of buying it from elsewhere? Just a crazy idea Im throwing out there.
Now if only this would become the norm in favor of US citizens...
What are the chances that The solar tariffs were a deal with china to reduce or end hostilities on the korean peninsula. how much damage was done with the tariffs already? how much more could be done before this may or may not go through?
The idea is to not be dependent on foreign countries and make these ourselves... we’d rather save a dollar than help our community grow...
Keep in mind the point of the tariffs is not to stifle green energy, but to force the Chinese to play fair.
I can answer that.

It would undo the betterment of humanity. It would perpetuate the financial fattening of the already over-bloated "oil barons" and "coal barons" who invested in the election of someone whose interests aligned with their own at the expense of everyone else. 

This is, at it's core, where the whole world - not just America - is in the most danger... The electoral, dictatorial and financial authority  ceded to those who haven't a shred of altruistic decency and respect for the world that keeps us all alive.

Rather than invest in a long term, sustainable future, the greedy and "get rich now" attitudes have convinced us all that our common sense is wrong. Hundreds of years of fossil fuels burned and pumped into the atmosphere while simultaneously wrecking the planets "lungs" so they and their corporations and their family's can have bigger numbers in their savings accounts.

I'm no hippie. I'm no uber-liberal peace-nik. But why we can't collectively see the benefit of using the cleanest and truly most abundant source of power - so much so that EVERY human in the planet could be swimming in electrical glory - in the world is baffling... The sun offers so much power that even at our low solar to electrical conversion rates we could all have access to more per than we need. It's these fat-cats who don't want to move on from their investments in old technology... They have to milk every penny from them in some sort of fascist corporate efficiency model.

Anyways... I could go on and on standing here on my virtual soapbox, but that doesn't fix anything. I just hope we can all think a bit more about whats really important in the next election cycle and look for candidates who aren't in the pockets of these heartless rich fucks. Just like our founding fathers thought it was important to separate church and state, I think it's high time we look long and hard at separating business from state. When has a corporation or industry truly demonstrated they give a shit about bettering mankind?

Don't worry, I can be convinced when I'm wrong. I'm not going to argue anyone who makes sense...
But Trump said a couple days ago that a bunch of factories were opening because of the tariffs and lots of new jobs and everyone loves it but the media won't give him credit!  Someone needs to just start calling him a liar to his face.
Not good, solar tariffs help American's by weaning them off of the tit of asia. 
Solar panel companies have already begun moving their manufacturing here to the USA to avoid the tariff. That's winning.
Tariffs don't stifle the growth of solar power... It encourages US manufacturing of solar power. Long term, the tariffs are a good thing. Even the EU has tariffs on solar panels.
You guys know that all the rare earth elements to make solar panels work comes from China, right?

Look up the process for mining these rare earth elements. China doesn't give a fuck about the environment, they dump chemicals straight into the rivers, killing all the vegetation and animals downstream. Entire villages wiped off the map because the people can't grow anything and all their livestock are dying. 
Reminds me of my landlord who is 88 years old and conservative. Our lease prohibits us from recycling or having recycling bins in the house. 

How stubborn do you have to be to force others to stop recycling?
The heads of oil tycoons are running the country and we're confused as to why solar power is being swept under the carpet?


I'm happy to see some resistance to the bullshit
That’s easy, the same good that comes from abolishing net neutrality.

Good for someone’s business and bad for everyone else.
Funny how the best possible future includes congress working together across the aisle against the president.

What a bizarre world.
But if we repeal these tariffs, those scumfuck oil barons won't be 0.001% richer when they die in 5 years! ^^/s
How are Chinese solar tariffs stifling growth of the solar industry? Go fuck yourselves. 
He has freshly washed coal he wants to sell you.  He also has cassette tapes, VCRs, and rotary phones.
Just repeal this stupid "president".
HISSSSSSSS renewable energy 


/s
Stifling the growth of solar, stifles money leaving the pockets.
I had a physics teacher a few years ago who said the most brilliant thing I’ve ever heard about solar energy. It was so simple, so elegant and while painfully obvious it struck a chord with me. 

“It’s just there.”
The solar lobby finally stepped up?
What's the original idea, exactly? Does China (or anybody else) have tariffs on ours?

All tariffs are bad, mind you, just wondering what the intent is.
https://www.ebay.com/itm/263594756874
Wonder what bullshit earmarks Republicans will sneak into this one.
Diversify your portfolio Tdog
Wait this dude taxed the sun? 
We should be moving to nuclear 
What has been the impact of the tarrifs thus far? 
Are the posters in this sub aware that these tariffs are just a continuation of the solar tariffs that Obama put into place?

https://www.reuters.com/article/us-china-trade/u-s-sets-new-tariffs-on-chinese-solar-imports-idUSBRE84G19U20120517

http://thehill.com/policy/energy-environment/261363-us-hits-china-with-solar-tariffs

https://www.cnbc.com/2018/03/21/china-says-wto-ruling-on-obama-tariffs-shows-us-is-a-repeat-abuser.html


Hillary Clinton’s negotiators agreed to plans for an urgent summit “in the first hundred days of the next administration” where the president will convene “the world’s best engineers, climate scientists, policy experts, activists, and indigenous communities to chart a course to solve the climate crisis.” https://thetylt.com/culture/should-climate-change-be-up-for-debate

https://qz.com/994459/the-us-is-relocating-an-entire-town-because-of-climate-change-and-this-is-just-the-beginning/

“Some country is going to be the clean energy superpower of the 21st century… I want it to be us.”  Hillary Clinton 8/11/16
How much you wanna bet Trump is making millions from investing in some stock, promoting, then selling. Ie. Tariff aluminum or steel. Its shares go down, and then he buys. Then sells them when tariffs are removed.
"Business man" ... "entrepreneur" ... "savvy"
> “I don’t know what good can possibly come as a consequence of stifling the growth of solar power.” 

Its obvious, trump and his gang want to profit off of them fossil fuels.
God damn it an ounce of sanity... Fucking government assholes. Damned Republicans are ruining this country. Fuck us over a barrel, wipe some of the cum off my back, and pretend like they did us a favor... Fuck you!!! 
Nobody here addressing the fact that it takes a lot of harmful chemicals to *make* solar panels. Who do you think is going to handle their waste better, American companies or Chinese ones?

Buying Chinese solar panels will be more harmful to the environment. If you really care about the environment the cheapest option is usually not the best one.

Couple quick sources: [1](https://sinosphere.blogs.nytimes.com/2014/06/02/chinas-solar-panel-production-comes-at-a-dirty-cost/) [2](http://dailycaller.com/2017/08/01/old-solar-panels-causing-an-environmental-crisis-in-china/)
The fact that solar power is a trap people sign up for without realizing the upkeep costs and replacement costs as well as inability to sell your house until you pay off the solar roof. Nobody talks about that.

If you signed up with Solar City and you have to sell your house? Guess what you cannot do that due to the contract, guess how much it will cost to tear down the solar roof? Thousands to tear it down and thousands to place it on your new house. 
A) it's not bipartisan

B) I guess when so called "net neutrality" fails, libturds have to latch onto some other non-issue because DRUMP. HOW MANY WILL DIE FROM SOLAR TARRIFS???!!

C) tariffs on solar equipment from other countries doesn't "stifle the growth of solar power".
It's great if you want to lower energy costs. Plus, manufacturing and transporting the solar panels requires a ton of pollution initially. The amount of raw materials that have to be refined (pollution) for solar panels is extremely understated. If it snows, they don't work. If it's cloudy, they only work at 50% capacity. 

Much better to invest in nuclear, much clearer and safer for the environment. Just boiling water and then containing the waste in isolated containers. Much better than manufacturing solar panels which emits tons of pollution into the air. 

Edit: downvotes are not a proper rebuttal. What part of my statement is inaccurate? I'll be waiting. 
The dumbest part is that Trump (Mr. “JOBS! JOBS! JOBS!”) tax on imported solar is jeapordizjng thousands (possibly tens of thousands) of installation jobs in order to protect like ~ 800 jobs at American solar panel manufacturers. 
Beautiful, clean coal, that’s what.
Actually, although Trump makes some questionable decisions, stifling the growth of solar power is a good thing.(not to mention that the tariffs are not intended to stifle solar power). 
https://www.economist.com/news/books-and-arts/21739640-bright-some-clouds-says-varun-sivaram-taming-sun-future-solar


The argument from The Economist is that the low cost of solar is being driven entirely from low cost solar panels from China rather than advances in technology. Solar along with most other renewables have the BIG problem that they can't be switched on or off, so they overload the system at various times resulting in a highly unstable grid. 

And while at other times they don't produce anything resulting in either fossil fuel stations to kick in or the power having to be stored, of which we don't currently have the technology for. 

The more solar power that's produced the more of a burden it becomes for the grid. The end result is that renewables end up being far more expensive than system run entirely on fossil fuels. 
Let’s do nothing then. 
Fuck the environment amirite?
US Solar Manufacturing will change the worlds need for oil. Russia's economy is dependent on selling oil and not much else. Trump is a treasonous russian agent. You think he woke up and thought an executive order on solar panel imports was a good idea?
let the free market function, man!  oh wait, that would mean globalism.  damn globalists! we need tariffs.. oh they're going to enact counter-tariffs, those freedom haters! "trade wars can be a good thing" why are repubs so goddamn fucking stupid? 
I’ve got this.

Begin by, as you said, letting the free market function. Nobody in their right mind (pun intended) would think of that as globalism; globalism is generally defined as the over-presence of X country in international affairs and a high regard for the international community that extends so far as to cause X country to make decisions that come at the expense of its citizens.

Remember that, “Let the free market function, man?” Well, we had to put in a lot of trade agreements to let that happen. You know how patents work? Well, in order to incentivize competition, we made them: papers that give the exclusive rights to create X invention for the inventor’s lifetime. We were even smart enough to make sure that patents apply all around the world via our trade agreements, in the form of intellectual property.

Do you hear that? I do. It’s the sound of Chinese cameras. What are they taking pictures of, I hear you ask? Our solar panels! B-but, those have patents on them! They are intellectual property! Well, X country now has two choices: They could let the theft fly, but, in doing so, weaken X country’s industry while China starts making copies of our shit that they didn’t even make at way lower prices because they pay their workers like shit. Hmm, not great. Wait a second! There’s another choice! It’s called...a tariff! The crowd gasps in amazement! But what does it do?

X country, to protect the free market, to punish China for stealing their shit, and to make a nice profit, places a big tax on solar panels from China, to make them uncompetitive in X country. China says, “Fuck you, here are some tariffs back!” And thus begins a trade war. After a while, Chinese companies start to get pissed. Their profits took a huge dive. Companies in X country, however, don’t really care; they didn’t make much profit in China because they were competing with assholes who stole their R&D and payed their employees jack shit. You could even say that, in this case, companies in X country were in a trade deficit with those in China. Huh. Cool. Not. 

China gives up after a while; they lost way too much money. Wow! Cool! Companies in X country are hyped! They can finally sell their shit without having it stolen constantly and compete reasonably with Mr. I-Pay-My-Workers-Nothing, CEO of Solar Theft, Inc. That trade war turned out pretty good for X. 

The name of X country? America.

Why are random people on the internet so fucking stupid?
The good is THEY TOOK ER JEERRRBS!!!
Just spitballing here, we pay off some debt? We encourage things to be made domestically instead of importing? I realize most democrats hate our country. But those are good things. 
"A tariff is a tax"  
Since when do democrats not want higher taxes?
Idiot comment
Remember attacks on solar energy are a benefit to Russia.

Russia's recent economic growth was spurred by just being lucky oil prices rose unexpectedly.  The national pension fund has now been emptied and folded into an emergency fund that will also run out of money.
Ah the age old "everything means drumpf is p00tin puppitz" theory. 
Okay, what good reason do you have for doing something that literally everyone says is idiotic and against the interest of America?
So you're coming from the point of view where tariffs can never be used on a good industry in a way that is beneficial to us? 

Are you one of these like libertarian extremists or something? People often look at economics in a context that is far removed from politics and it's just incorrect to do that. 
> literally everyone says is idiotic and against the interest of America?

This appeal to popularity is the only idiocy here.

The idea is to make America more independent.  That's the literal purpose of the Declaration of **Independence**, to not have to rely on others.  To be strong enough to make what we need ourselves to not owe other nations anything.

China's undercutting with what amounts to slave labor and sub-par quality in a wide array of products has done much damage to US businesses over the last few decades. Prices may go up for a time, but it always does when you actually build a more reliable future.

Regardless to *popular belief* it's not a nation's duty to cease being a nation and begin being part of a collective, that's actually contrary to the purpose of being a nation.

Funneling money and jobs to China isn't going to help establish world peace or other hippy commune wild imaginings, it only further damages the local economy.

It's funny, the party that claims to not be xenophobic fears russia , claims to not be racist but wants to prosper off of the cheap/defacto slave labor of non-whites on the other side of the planet, in the name of making the planet "better".  The party that claims to be all about the environment is fine with having their products *made in China, who has far less regulations than the US when it comes to pollution.*

What happened to that great political "switch"?  It sure doesn't show in the practices.  I'm just seeing a lot of hypocrisy.

I think a lot of people just can't stand success, be it rich individuals or strong independent countries.
We don't buy oil from russia
What does the GOP have against a job creater that builds new markets for a larger economy? 
Seems hypocritical.....AGAIN!!!!!
Tariffs encourage manufacturers to produce in the country they want to sell in. Over the past thirty years we've seen manufacturers leaving America, taking the jobs with them. 

There's nothing stifling about these tariffs. The research continues, and manufacturers simply have to make a choice of where to produce.
The number of jobs lost installing, selling and maintaining panels due to the tariff is an order of magnitude greater than the jobs likely created by the manufacturing process created in the U.S.


This is doubly true with automation, which will be extra attractive when faced with the cost of paying humans in the US.
And the costs to society for manufacturing goods in a country where the cost of labor is higher and the facilities/workforce necessary for production of said technology have been actively stifled by backward policies and politicians?
> There's nothing stifling about these tariffs.

A recent quote from a [regional paper](http://www.kxan.com/news/local/austin/us-metal-tariffs-already-impacting-texas-companies/1074212815):

> Texas companies say the price of goods and services has already increased 10-15 percent since President Donald Trump enacted a tariff on steel and aluminum. They expect the price to continue to increase, which means that'll be passed down to its consumers. 

And this was predicted. Economists agree that evidence shows that tariffs result in higher prices for consumers. Higher prices is what happens when tariffs are enacted.
I agree with that when it comes to some products, but should it actually matter where solar panels are produced? We should be encouraging as much growth in green energy as possible. I couldn't care less if they were made here, because the benefits of not using non-renewable resources makes up for it.
Because some countries have no environmental protections and pollute like hell. (China)
Do you also not care when US company that does actual innovation goes bankrupt, while Chinese company that stole it's IP gets all the profit?
That's what tariffs do conceptually, sure. All it does realisticly is encourage foreign manufacturers to use cheaper materials and other cost-cutting measures in order to compete with US products, and start trade wars.
Can't *start* a trade war that is *already happening.*  China's been at it for years.
Why do you people want to be slaves to China forever? How about Americans just make the best and affordable solar panels and we won't have to worry about it. 
coming from an american. did u forget ur real history of slavery already?
No, I didn't, but im talking about 2018 not 200 years ago. 
Um... the tariffs are explicitly intended to *grow* the solar industry by restricting China's ability to steal IP and undercut American companies with slave labor. Chinese companies can manufacture goods at very low cost because they almost totally lack environmental/labor regulations, but they don't innovate at all. How can the solar industry grow if the companies that make all the advancements are priced out of the market with their own stolen tech?
do u check under ur bed for chinese boogeyman every night?
Because opposing slave labor is paranoid am I right? Deo Vindice! /s
There are a lot of Sunbelt Republicans who can't afford to support this tariff. The solar industry is what makes their states such a growing hub for high tech jobs.
It won't come to anything unless he signs the bill. The only way to fix this problem is with a good turn out in November.
*best interests of Chinese corporations.
Or they have invested interests in foreign solar companies lol I don't believe one second that they think about the people they are supposed to represent. 
I work in solar. This isn’t an evil republican thing. This started durings Obama’s administration and is done by a non partisan commerce authority who crunches numbers and determines these things. 

First off at the end of the day these tariffs increase 3% and 6% on residential and utility scale end of the day project cost. Pretty small. However the long term gain is expected to be important. We are already seeing a LOT of investment happening in US manufacturing and research and development. We expect this to increase. Sunpower just invested tons in their acquisition of US based Solar World as an example. 

Second. This tariff is targeted at China exclusively who is extremely anti competitive and cheating with stolen American IP. Every other country can get an exception from the tariff. Residential rarely uses Chinese panels and if they do, don’t trust that company.

Finally, this tariff not only allows a large amount of cheap Chinese panels tariff free, but tapers off after a few years. This tariff is really just a short term thing designed to give American infrastructure time to develop and become more competitive. Solar is the future so we need to protect and help establish this future industry. This comes at a time when the government is investing hundreds of millions into solar technology so we want to secure the industry and allow it to develop. We don’t want to hand this over to the shady Chinese. 

Seriously. These tariffs are a good thing. Repealing it is just political theater because people want to spin this as an anti trump thing. He had nothing to do with this.  
You mean the bullshit agenda of getting the technology here in the USA and manufacture here in the us?... that bullshit agenda?
as great as this looks i expect the only reason is their own investments.
Huh. Has it been once a year already?
The Chinese? 
Hey look my representative Ralph Norman doing something besides illegally brandishing his goddamned gun in front of his constituents. Shocking.
But what about the coal? that beautiful, sexy, clean coal ^^^/j
What shit are they going to sneak into it though?
I work in solar. Republicans care as much about constituents as they care about black people. The only reason they are going along with this bill is because the solar industry is finally big enough to afford to buy Republicans.

>In addition to our two lobby firms, SEIA hired former Senate Republican Leader 
Trent Lott and his team at Squire Patton and Boggs to give us greater access to 
Senate Republican offices. 

>https://www.seia.org/sites/default/files/SEIA_Annual%2520Report-web.pdf

You can trust me because I work in solar and my comment has been gilded.

haha. yeah, when the bluewave was no where to be seen, they all kissed trump's ass, and supported every shit move he made. Now that their seats are in danger. they dont want anything to do with Mr.Trump. 

Fuck em. Fuck the GOP leadership. Republicans really need to understand, progress cant ve stopped. Hardline conservatims is ruining this nation. Chose better candidates. Fuck the GOP, take back control of your party again. Dont let hardliners dictate your stance on anything. You guys are better than this.
The best interest of present and future investments you said ?
> which is easy to do when you pay slave wages.

also when you steal intellectual property, which is no problem at all for the Chinese.
EU taxed chinese solar panels too, likely because of price dumping.
Why do you think tarrifs aren't the answer?
We can't even sell equipment to Chinese solar manufacturers because of their unfair trading practices.

How about we take the tariffs and apply them to solar tax credits and incentives. Win win. 
Tariffs are the answer China and other countries have been using tariffs of American products for years.... 

This isn’t a free market it hasn’t been for quite some time
> Clearly, tariffs aren't the answer

Yes they are. That's how you create a level playing field, and ensure domestic production with appropriate standards (labor AND environmental) can financially compete.

You can't say it's not the answer without providing an alternative solution. What's yours? Economists everywhere are eager to know.
The US solar market is mostly installers and panel makers, not manufacturers of individual cells. The tariff didn’t make any sense as it was set up.
This is what's happening, and it's amazing how anything Trump related just gets the knee jerk "IT MUST BE EVIL!"

People: if we insist on worker protections and labor laws (no child labor, minimum wage, minimum working conditions, etc.) then we MUST protect the market that those workers sell into. If we allow countries without those standards to undercut our workers, we're fighting a losing battle and we will keep losing jobs and market share.

This is just another congressmen acting on behalf of the big solar companies (Sun Power etc) who want to keep producing cheap panels abroad to keep costs down and profits high. The idea that this is in the best interest of the workers in the US is utterly ludicrous.
Why arent import tariffs the answer? What would be the answer?
Who cares if China makes the panels? The US solar economy is service based - tons more people employed in installation, sales, policy, etc than in manufacturing. Some of the biggest US solar companies assemble their panels in China. Plus, we need the panels *now* if we hope to combat climate change, we can't afford to be wasting time on a trade war.
Yeah, it's only OK when it's "American companies" using Chinese labor undercutting US based companies.
So what do you think the answer is?
The point of a tariff is exactly to deal with this problem. The trouble is you have to have a stiff upper lip dealing with the initial pushback. I really couldn’t care less if Harley Davidson sells less bikes in China if it makes any kind of appreciable dent in their continued and ongoing American IP theft. They’d be 20 years behind us if it weren’t for greedy execs allowing IP transfer to their factories to save a buck over producing in Korea instead of Shenzhen. 
Wage Slave‽ that's what the United States is. 

The entirety of us. Slaves to a fake work industry. 
Sure, but we know damn well that's not why Trump did it.
Argument can also be made that many states in US pays slave wages with poor workers benefits as well compared to other countries like Canada and EU

US is no different
This.

I cant understand why people are fighting this so hard. Look at the history of it first, then look at the future.

This allows next Gen solar to go into manufacturing, which is better all the way around. Stopping this tarrif is shory sighted and just plain bad business.
What does this have to do with the thread?
Would this be good for US solar panel production then? In which case why is everyone clamoring for it to be repealed?
Who cares if China makes the panels? The US solar economy is service based - tons more people employed in installation, sales, policy, etc than in manufacturing. Some of the biggest US solar companies assemble their panels in China. Plus, we need the panels *now* if we hope to combat climate change, we can't afford to be wasting time on a trade war.
Yes you are right, but at the same time, it’s not solar cell production where the Americans have jobs. It’s solar installation. The tariffs might help American solar panel producers, but it will seriously hurt the installers.
So we want to pay more for solar?  Is that what the American people want?  I know I sure as hell don't want to pay more just so the panels can be manufactured by some lazy ass here in the US making 30.00 an hour to stare at a machine.
> The good would be allowing domestic solar manufacturing the financial ability to grow inside the US, as opposed to being reliant on imports from China and India, where environmental regulations are dog shit and labor laws can make you weep.

Yet when Canada tries to get those very things, good environmental and employment standards, included in international trade agreements everyone loses their minds.


Most American solar jobs are installation
Problem is China offers free international shipping with their panels. A US company still has to pay for shipping of these panels. The costs differences are insane. So insane, Canadian companies have found a way to purchase Chinese panels but sell them with the Canada flag on the product. There's no way to compete with the Chinese unless tariffs are involved. 
Solar isn't a good source of energy; I don't get why people have such a big hard on for wind and solar. Wind and solar are only good for emergency storage, peak hours and personal use. To store the amount of energy you'd need for a country the size of the US on batteries is astronomical, with our current battery technology it's not feasible. While I think it's great to have a diverse energy plan, solar isn't as environmentally healthy as everyone thinks it is. The production methods for the panels and batteries are severely damaging and non-recyclable and you have to destroy large areas of environment to make solar farms, the large solar farms make birds spontaneously combust from heat. Better alternatives to solar at the moment are geo-thermal where available, hydro/ocean power, and nuclear power. Nuclear will probably be the cleanest and most consistent form of energy in the near future.
but that's stupid as fuck.  if you can't compete, find something else to do, or innovate so that you can be competitive.  why is going "american made solar" better?  this is literally the free market at work.  why are you complaining?  there is no such thing as "unfair trade" because "fairness" is a meaningless, intangible concept.  
Solyndra was based on tech that got beaten out because it was too expensive and not efficient enough. Do *you* remember it?
> Tarrifs may be needed to save the solar panel industry.

If it's anything like their other mass produced underpriced electronics, it will save itself, once people realize that the slightly more expensive American panels will actually last 20 years and don't have solder defects that snap apart if a tree branch hits it.  
What’s the point of trying to save ~30,000 manufacturing jobs by jeopardizing ~260,000 installation jobs?

[SOURCE](http://fortune.com/2017/02/07/us-solar-jobs-2016/) 
It's funny to have an opinion and then admit you haven't read up on it.
> than you’re just a partisan with no clue what’s going on.

That's /politics to a T.

Firstly, fully half the commentators don't even read articles. This is plainly evident when people respond to clickbait headlines that are literally contradicted withinin the article(which happens quite often on the sub).

Secondly, of those that do read the article, a great many are still just partisan amateur(hopefully) pundits with little to no functional knowledge of civics, economics, politics, US history, etc etc etc.

Speaking of:  [Study: People with less political knowledge think they know a lot about politics](https://www.reddit.com/r/science/comments/8ctlyn/study_people_with_less_political_knowledge_think/)

The sad reality is, these sorts of people are more addicted to being seen and collecting fake internet points for advocating for their side in the perceived drama than anything else.
I have not read a single comment in the top like 50 against the tariffs and like 70% of them are complaining about how "nobody" knows what they do...
Oh, do tariffs make our products cheaper? Or do they just make everything cost more?

I'm sure that'll be *great* for the solar industry.
You have no idea what you’re talking about, but it feels good to be in a mob, right?
> However I feel like I'm going to look into this only to realize that there is a solid reason for them being there in the first place.

The goal is to be more independent as a nation instead of funneling money overseas while businesses here suffer and even close down.  Added bonus is we're not supporting China's pollution and defacto slave labor and the otherwise oppressive regime.

Yeah, prices can suck, but we're a prosperous nation, and the more money we keep in our own nation the less we need to have reliance on someone else.

This is critically important should bad things happen in the future.  It keeps problems isolated instead of dragging down the whole global beast.  War, famine, natural disaster, etc.
This so this.  They seem to think if we make solar more expensive that suddenly people will want coal again.  They forget that the plants are nearing eol and that the cost to mine and ship it make it more expensive than solar or wind per kw. So they don’t seem to understand how the actual market forces have helped move away from coal and not the evil Obama.  


The fun fact is gas plants are on the rise due to cheap supply and cheap to build plants connected to pipelines for ease of transit.  Thanks Obama.  lol 
Iirc a lot of the oil companies are now “energy companies” that have diversified into renewables. Oil has not been doing very well for a while, at least in Houston. Fracking has really hurt the high dollar drilling market. I don’t even think coal is that powerful, but catering to it really helps Trump’s message that he’s fighting for “real Americans.”


Source - my dad and his wife are lifelong engineers in the Houston oil industry and have been unemployed for like 2 years now. Worked for Shell, BP, KBR, Schlumberger, etc.
His favorite emblem of the evils of trade is the coal industry. Never mind that it isn't really trade at fault, and the fact that the entire world is moving past coal. It's just another part of his delusional idea of himself and the world.
"current powers". I see what you did there.
Yeah but when you hate everything about America your fellow americans getting jobs or not having them outsourced to other countries is a terrible thing.
It's absolutely true to that China engages in wholesale theft of intellectual property, globally. I see the inability to deal with this just part of the general inability of this government to understand that that is in fact warfare. When it comes to matters technological, leadership is incredibly stupid. This just might be a symptom of the fact that it's old man cronyism that primarily influences political decisions.
> China said they were going to open a plant in the US

Uh, OK then.
Man, China does capitalism even better than the U.S.! 
It shouldn't. Our Congress wants to help US solar. Even Schumer has applauded Trump's pressure on bad Chinese trade agreements.

http://thehill.com/homenews/senate/379738-schumer-praises-trumps-china-trade-crackdown
Environment comes first and price is a huge factor. American solar needs to be competitive in the global market.
And the way to put america first is by  jeopardizing 260,000 installation jobs to save 30,000 manufacturing jobs? 


[Source](http://fortune.com/2017/02/07/us-solar-jobs-2016/)
That’s actually a lot of jobs, and 15% is a large fraction that could theoretically be increased if there were financial motivation to do so. 
As much as I despise Trump these tariffs as literally a continuation of tariffs Obama placed. Obama put tariffs, China found loop hole, Obama placed new tariffs, China found other loop hole, Trump places tariffs. Even Al Gore is in favor of these tariffs.

The only difference is when Obama did it the media didn't care. When trump does it, it's the end of the world.
Shifting the growth of this technology to America by creating an environment where American solar production can thrive?
Growth means change he can't control. And by control, of course I mean totally ruin. And, his generally reactionary, knee-jerk response to anything that irks him, results in him attacking everything he doesn't understand. And that is most of the world.
A new technology which requires tons of pollution to manufacture and tons more to ship across the oceans. Sounds like removing solar panels from the market would be an environmentalist goal, instead of attacking people who look at the consequences of their actions and understand the science behind global emissions. 
Absolute toss
Ikr? Solar energy is completely useless as a clean energy. The pollution manufacturing panels is extremely understated. 
A panel produces electricity for 25 years. Unless the manufacturering process involves burning 25 years of coal I think we're at a net positive.
10 years is a more accurate timeline. Having worked with a private solar company, 10 years is more average, at least in California.  And even then, a hydroelectric dam would generate more continuous energy with safter consequences. There are more clean options available other than manufacturing. 
You cant build dams everywhere. You can place a panel nearly anywhere. Youre making a specious argument. 
You can rebuild dilapidated dams. In California there are numerous cases of infrastructure which could be improved, but historically environmentalists have blocked construction near rivers and lakes. We literally have a situation where the people fighting the most for the environment are the ones hurting it the most. By blocking construction near lakes and rivers, this increases the demand for solar, which increases global emissions. The best environmentalists understands that society requires some waste to function and we improve our world by mitigating our waste locally not globally. 

Solar panels do not work in snow, they do not work 100% in cloudy days. In Humboldt county, solar panels on at 50% of the time due to dark cloud weather. Solar panels do not work everywhere. 
It’s not even close to the pollution of what we currently use though. 
Shipping around the world is one of the largest contributors to climate change. And where do we get most of our panels from? A place thousands of miles away called China. 
Good thing coal doesn't get shipped. Right? 
The point of the tariifs is to drive local production of the panels, reducing emissions and depending on another country to provide them to us. If you want less pollution in production, wouldn't you rather have them made stateside? 
Not as often as Chinese solar panels. 
What about every other supply that goes into coal mining?  Are they just magically produced on-site?
A few chinese companies have dumping issues [but most are fine](https://relay.nationalgeographic.com/proxy/distribution/public/amp/news/energy/2014/11/141111-solar-panel-manufacturing-sustainability-ranking).

At least it isn't [radioactive](https://www.scientificamerican.com/article/coal-ash-is-more-radioactive-than-nuclear-waste/).
Most are fine? You have way too much trust in the Chinese government and the figures that are released to the public. 

Containing radioactive material is better than polluting into the air non-stop. 
> polluting into the air

Solar manufacture isn't an air polluter, it's leaks and dumping from the chemical baths.  At least 75% of supply comes from companies doing it right, if you read my first link you'd know that the best one is actually_in_ China. You don't have secret knowledge about the deal-breaking pollution of solar panels; someone misled you.
Refining raw material does emit into the air. Just because the final stages of manufacturing does not include a chimney does not mean there was no emissions during the process. 
ok now your just trolling
Wait, you didn't know the Chinese government has historically falsified data and figures? 
shut up troll
A for effort 
Can you give me evidence from a reliable/unbiased source to support this. It’s sounds interesting but without evidence(if there is any) it’s very hard to believe 
https://youtu.be/IvQf3zHX4cQ

https://youtu.be/TqVRNupPmNI

There's a Prager University video describing it all. I'm assuming you'd rather listen to a university study and watch footage of the factory. 
Prager university is not a credible source. 
I didn't link to Prager, click the links and you might have known. They're neutral videos. 
That doesn't change the fact that you seem to believe the ultra conservative PragerU vlog is a reliable source and possibly an actual university. It is neither.
Did I link them, or not? Did I link to other sources? Why are you dragging on with a source I specifically said I left out because they're biased? Let me repeat myself, I specifically left out Prager U because they are biased. Where the hell did you read that I believe PragerU is neutral? 
Asks for evidence from a reliable source.

Is provided with YouTube videos... and a mention of PragerU (lol).

How about *real* research?
A university study from Notre Dame is not credible enough for you? 
It’s not a university study it’s just a Norte Dame student project.
With sources for all of their points. Are they wrong in their assessment? You seem to be attacking their character and not the substance of their work. Did you watch the video and the sources they provided? 

Here's another source for ya, with pictures to help you visualize the process. 

https://youtu.be/Ah5tM4kw9To
I think Carnegie Mellon is an excellent source, but it doesn’t seem to prove your point, in fact it seems to further back my claim that solar energy is the future of energy.
Did you watch the video? They explain the pollution generated.
PragerU is not a real university, and the videos do not seem like the most reliable sources. What would be a reliable source is the articles the videos cited. The Norte dame video seems to quote [this](https://news.nationalgeographic.com/news/energy/2014/11/141111-solar-panel-manufacturing-sustainability-ranking/) National Geographic article. It says the same information but I would deem it a much more reliable source and because of that I actually believe it and am slightly reconsidering my views on solar.
Huh, that's weird, because in the comment in replying to right now there's no mention of bias or neutrality at all. Just a couple of video links and a recommendation to watch a propaganda university video that's describes it all.
Recommendation? I literally said there is a Prayer U video about this, but I'm not showing it because there are better neutral sources. What recommendation are you pulling out of your ass?
This might be the stupidest thing I've seen one of you cultists say, and that is really saying something. 
Ignoring science I see. 
Lol what?
How stupid do you have to be to believe this?
Jesus.
I believe in science and strive to understand the consequences of the actions I fight for. 
“I believe in science”
Science isnt a belief system, its method of validation and accruement of knowledge.
That said of *course* solar power requires extraction of elements from the earth. Any 2 year old could tell you that.

The question is what’s preferable continuous extraction or trying to limit the amount of extraction that is being done.

You’re not making a scientific argument youre making an economic argument and you dont even know it.

The real issues are;
Sunk cost - ie the infrastructure for fossil fuels is already built and renewables is not.

Maturity of the technology- fossil fuel is pretty much at a dead end and renewables are in their infancy.

Political cost - securing fossil fuels requires ongoing military intervention to ensure that soccer moms can drive lil Jr. to soccer practice.
Then why are so many here ignoring the fact that solar panels increase global emissions? Basic science, if you burn something stuff gets emitted. I swear some people believe solar panels have no waste associated with them. That's ignoring science. 
It's not "no waste". It's less waste. You're ignoring basic math.
And at the same time claiming “he believes in science”
As if everyone else is some kind of idiot.
Well, when you fight global warming with products that increase global emissions, you might be an idiot. 
I feel like hes signed up for a team that he thinks is right and simply swallowing everything they feed to him.

To be fair they have gotten particularly psycopathic by casting fossil fuels as environmentally friendlier than renewables.
Sounds similar to the brainwashed people who cannot question anything beyond what they're told. 
When you argue the same wrong points repeatedly after having sufficient discussion, you might be an idiot. Or a troll. 
When you insult the person's character instead of the substance of their thoughts, you might be a bigot. Or a anti-science denier. 
Ah the Imrubberyoureglue defense.
Making zero sum arguments makes you look stupid.
Right, because explaining science and how pollution occurs is zero sum. Wouldn't every environmentalist argument include zero sum by your definition? They're literally fighting for one market to lower while another raises. 
https://www.nrel.gov/analysis/life-cycle-assessment.html

Less emissions over lifetime than fossil fuels or coal, including production and transportation. 


Not including recycling the panels after use. 
Because thats an idiotic argument solar panels arent a panacea, they clearly have extraction costs and lower energy density.

The real question is twofold is the power provided by solar power cleaner per watt and can that number be improved over time. The answer to both of those are yes.

The argument you’re making isn’t scientific it actually isnt even logical since its a zero sum argument.

The real argument is does solar offer *less* environmental impact over its lifespan as opposed to does it offer no environmental impact.
The most insidious thing about what you’re postulating is the inherent dishonesty of it. Since its clearly not a logical argument its based on being dishonest about the premises of the argument.
That is to say you start with something you believe and roll backwards to a conclusion and then claim you’re making a scientific argument to cloak yourself under the guise of being rational.

This means that 
A. You read something idiotic, didnt spend a single second thinking it through, and repeated it.
B. You watched something idiotic, didnt spend a single second thinking it through, and repeated it.

Im going to go with C. For all of the above.
With non-asnwers like these you really could put a cardboard cutout and no one would realize the difference. 

With all of those words, you didn't asnwer or explain a single point. 

>The real question is twofold is the power provided by solar power cleaner per watt and can that number be improved over time. The answer to both of those are yes.

We're talking about pollution here, not efficiency per watt. 

>The argument you’re making isn’t scientific it actually isnt even logical since its a zero sum argument.

Actually, I'm describing a scientific explanation for why solar panels hurt our environment through emissions. Similar to how some conservatives ignore science, you're ignoring the science behind manufacturing and international shipping.

>The real argument is does solar offer *less* environmental impact over its lifespan as opposed to does it offer no environmental impact.

No. The real argument is how much net pollution does solar panels reduce/increase? Every 10 years a new one has to be installed, and old one can be recycled. But recycling requires more pollution. 


>The most insidious thing about what you’re postulating is the inherent dishonesty of it. Since its clearly not a logical argument its based on being dishonest about the premises of the argument.

What is this non-answer? I've been extremely honest within my responses. Not logical to talk about the manufacturing and shipping pollution behind creating a product? You're being dishonest and manipulative here with this non-answer. Very hostile way to converse I might add. 

>That is to say you start with something you believe and roll backwards to a conclusion and then claim you’re making a scientific argument to cloak yourself under the guise of being rational.

You might be explaining your own thought process here. Why are solar panels good again? Because of the end result? So you ignore the whole process by starting with something you believe in and working backwards to justify your ideology? 

>This means that 
>A. You read something idiotic, didnt spend a single second thinking it through, and repeated it.
>B. You watched something idiotic, didnt spend a single second thinking it through, and repeated it.
>
>Im going to go with C. For all of the above.

And reported for not being civil. Directly targeting an individual with insults and generally being dishonest with their points. 

Have a great day. 
😂😂😂😂
I have been reported what shall I do!

You keep making idiotic arguments, first of all panel life is estimed between 25/30 years and fossil fuels cannot be recycled *at all*. So claiming that they arent clean is again not the point.
You’re making zero sum arguments and that my friend is idiotic.

Feel free to report me again einstein.
Worked with a private solar company bud, 25 years is what they sell you on the box. 10 years is working average. Recycling old panels creates more pollution. So essentially, solar panels triple dip in air pollution what coal would do once. One for manufacturing, another for international shipping, and another for recycling. So a solar panel over 15 years generates more air pollution than some coal burning once. 

Love that little bit at the end about describing your own thought process. Explained a lot honestly. 
> So a solar panel over 15 years generates more air pollution than some coal burning once. 

I would love to see some data on this.
🙄
So now you’re a psychologist in addition to a scientist.

Well fuck me please regale me with shitty psychological arguments in addition to your shitty scientific ones.

Again its not a zero sum comparison. 
No you don't. 
Way to be specific. 

"Nah ahh" is an equivalent response. 
Hi, how's the weather in Moscow today?
People like you are the reason why USA will lose its world leader position.
If you haven't noticed our previous leaders already allowed that to happen. 
Yeah sure. Go back shovelling coal trumpanzee. I'm not the one praising a man who is the laughing stock of the free world.
You honestly think we're beating China at manufacturing? We've been losing for a long time. Welcome to why Trump won, because people refuse to acknowledge their consequences for their party's actions. There's a reason why Nintendo doesn't manufacture products in Japan anymore. There's a reason why Apple products are made in China. But thanks to your confusion and ignorance, Trump was able to win through simply being right while everyone else put their head in the sand singing "we're still number one" while the world laughed at us. 
Do you really think people could afford an iphone if it was made in the USA??? Why the fuck would you want americans to work shitty jobs in factories at minimum wage?
Most of a phones costs come after being manufactured actually. Theoretically if the government wanted to, they could force Apple to sell their products closer to the manufacture costs. 

A $1,000 iPhone could be $250 and still make a profit. Apple is simply overextending the price after the device has been created to generate more profit.

So an iPhone built in America could theoretically still be $1000 and still turn a profit. Just less profit. But saving the environment due to lowering he demand for international shipping. A win win. 
I love how you spend your days spewing bullshit everywhere on reddit. Are you paid to say these shit or youre just an other trump lunatic?
Questioning manufacturing pollution is now being a Trump supporter. This is why Trump won, you're pushing moderates out of the party.  
TIL that not wanting to sacrifice 260,000 instillation jobs to get back 350 jobs means that I hate America.
Manufacturing in the US is tiny compared to installation which is massive. This cuts off the nose to spite the face. A blunt, dumb solution.
It's not just limited to solar power either. Offshore wind is perfectly viable as well.
Source?
Yes you’re absolutely right! The production does need greater environmental oversight. Which is exactly why we need to shift our focus more toward solar and hydro than fossil fuels. The system.

Also, the environmental harm caused by the production of the panels is offset by the fact that the panels stay productive with little to no maintenance for decades. That, while doing no further damage to the environment. Whereas fossil fuels cause damage being mined, being refined, and being used. 
These idiots don't care. Wasting you're fingers away on dogs.
That.. doesn't even sound legal. How can that be enforceable?
Wtf thats infringement of your rights or somethin
Lmao. Our prez just introduced tariffs to BOOST American Solar.

How the hell does that benefit oil tycoons?
One of the largest solar panel mfgs in America is an ex subsidary of Monsanto. They're all in the same bucket, this is their attempt at fighting off foreign competition.
Take a moment to research the local state of Solar Energy, then come back to your comment.
Good for the business in the U.S., which spends millions on R&D and pays workers decent wages, bad for the guys in China who have committed more cases of intellectual property theft than any other nation, period, and the guys who pay their workers slave wages. 
You can try in 2020.
Solar bad, not profitable to donors, coal and oil good, very profitable... At least the way this administration seems to act.
He taxed chinese companies that ship low quality products that are dangerous sometimes. 
Okay, but have you considered her emails? 
There are literally laws to stop that. 
Low IQ individual. 
A statement from ignorance like that implicates you.
A) Yes it is bipartisan, notice the Dem. and Rep. representatives? Do you even know what bipartisan means?

> The Protecting Solar Jobs Act was introduced in the House Committee on Ways and Means with backing from Rep. Jared Huffman (D-Calif.), Rep. Mark Sanford (R-SC), Rep. Ralph Norman (R-SC) and Rep. Steve Knight (R-Calif.)

B)  Show me a single person who said, "HOW MANY WILL DIE FROM SOLAR TARRIFS." It's about protecting jobs, setting up America for the future of energy, and about protecting the environment.

C) Yes, it does, there have been quite a bit written about this.  Here: 

[Example 1] (https://www.greentechmedia.com/articles/read/forecast-shows-how-tariffs-will-hurt-solar-growth-state-by-state)

[Example 2] (https://www.forbes.com/sites/jillbaker/2018/04/06/tariffs-on-chinese-solar-products-are-set-hurt-the-u-s-rather-than-help-it-heres-why/#3d8306f21ea4)

[Example 3] (https://www.nytimes.com/2018/01/23/us/politics/trump-solar-tariffs.html)

I could keep going but I know it's not like you will read them anyway.  Your dipshittery is astounding and I have a hard time believing you have read anything outside Breitbart or Fox News in your life.
It’s so crazy to see you guys actively argue against your own interests just because “libruls”. Jesus, is there not a chance for compromise and things we can all agree on?
What a strange troll
Facts are offensive here at Reddit! 
That comment didn’t contain any facts. 
Nuclear is far more expensive than renewables. Also no one wants to touch it because of the stigma. Solar, Wind and Hydro energy backed by batteries is where we're headed
Fun fact nuclear waste will remain radioactive until after the suns expands and consumes earth. It’s also currently s impossible to 100% safely dispose of it. Once a safe way to dispose of the nuclear waste that lasts thousands of years is created if will be great.
If you want to be taken seriously, you should include figures on *how much* pollution making a solar panel creates, vs. the alternatives we currently have in place.  

You're not going to find much disagreement on nuclear, but that's not the same as saying we shouldn't drop tariffs on solar panels which is the discussion here.
Where are the numbers that back up your statements? Everything has manufacturing energy cost. 

 Solar doesn't just lower energy costs; along with wind, it produces perfectly clean energy and can be placed strategically on existing and new construction. The real savings is reducing power plant emissions buy eliminating the need and feeding electricity back to the grid to further reduce emissions.
Uh, maybe you haven't noticed but facts are extremely offensive here at Reddit.
We must do this ASAP. The tragic, deadly solar panel disasters have got to stop!
So manufacturing nuclear plants doesn't cause pollution? Nuclear plants don't produce massive amounts of nuclear waste? There is plenty of room on earth where it doesn't snow and where it's sunny all day long and once solar panels are working they have 0 environmental impact which is not true of any other energy source including wind.
There are so many belts in America, it's like a final fantasy character
Exactly, apparently Rick Perry of all people was important in growing the wind and solar in Texas because his true love is money not fossil fuels.
>Bipartisan

I'm not the only one that saw this right?
Well that settles it, these two sentences have been parsed by my meager brain and will be recalled when I'm asked for a hot take on this subject.
Florida would not be included in your sunbelt
Generally republican economic policy is against tariffs at least historically 
Yeah this makes no sense of them to do. Their rural base is booming here with solar and there are jobs that are 18$/hr starting no college 
Sunbelt? Foh
[removed]
From Feb. 2017:

"The U.S. solar industry employed 260,077 workers last year, a nearly 25% increase in the number of jobs from 2015."

http://fortune.com/2017/02/07/us-solar-jobs-2016/
You're talking about jobs that already exist, he's talking about jobs to be created in the next few years.  Do you have a source that more than 20,000 jobs will be created in the next few years?
i mean 25% increase that concludes with over 250k (without looking up any new numbers)
is significantly more than 20k over the course of "a few years"

Given a basic understanding of where the employment in this sector is concentrated....installation, maintenance, sales, expansion and maintenance of related infrastructure....

AAAand given that there was no reason to expect anything other than a dramatic expansion in the industry in the US, barring some crazy sabotage like trump's actions....WELL...you dont need any numbers that were not stated in this thread to conclude that 20k is anywhere from 4x to 10x smaller than a reasonable expectation.

even a 10% increase in industry employment would result in 26k new jobs.

this is a really low bar you are setting.
Do you have a source on future numbers?  Because the other poster is just going to come in here and tell you that your numbers are wrong and come up with his own line of reasoning to justify it.  Without a source, you're really just getting into a pissing contest here.
there is no such thing as a source for future numbers.

Asking for a source in this situation is actually amusing.  Was I not clear that the original suggestion that less than a 10% increase "in a few years" is laughable given any other piece of information?

just the fact that a similar recent period had a 25% growth will tell you that.  Or knowing about energy issues in even the vaguest ways.  Any idiot knows the solar industry has exploded recently and actually come to unsubsidized profitability in many places.

predicted numbers are exactly as good as the methods used.  I was transparent about my methods.

the only reason I made a comment was to shame OP for frivilous bullshit.  the source OP questioned was more than sufficient source to answer their questions.

The fact you cant see that makes you complicit with OPs intrusive stupidity.

I demand you show me a source that shows why the sources provided arnt sufficient...

sound ridiculous enough?
Well,they went from 208,000 in 2015 to 260,000 in 2017, so that's 52,000 jobs in 2 years.

Averages out to 26,000 jobs per year, and the solar industry is actually accellerating, so they're adding more and more jobs each year.
The part where he mentions total makes your argument in his defense invalid. 
> You're talking about jobs that already exist, he's talking about jobs to be created in the next few years.

Since the tariffs also threaten jobs that already exist, if that was his argument (which I doubt) it doesn't make sense.
Solar already employs way more people than coal 
Regular coal or clean coal?
The latter is 0 anyways
Yeah, it takes a lot of people to wash all that coal.
That's a tautology.
Beautiful, clean coal
You're probably thinking of how many people MANUFACTURE new solar panels in the US. I think there's only 2 companies who actually make them. There's way way WAY more jobs in solar doing other things like installation, sales, technicians, etc.
I think it's worth removing this comment since it's very inaccurate. 
something something, the fastest way to get the answer to a question is to post the wrong one, if it weren't for that comment and it's correction I wouldn't have known the correct data
Can you not pretend to know what you're talking about. We have fox news for that. 
And the coal industry employs less people than Arby's.
You're either a shill or a complete idiot. Either way, you're dangerously hostile to humanity. 
He’s “dangerously hostile to humanity” because he posted a false statistic in an internet comment? You’re overreacting a little.
Yeah, the dude was very wrong but dangerously hostile is so dramatic it's comedic. Imagine if bullshitters were arrested and executed. 

Some dude standing around at a party claims Nuclear energy caused more deaths than any alternative and some men in black suits drag him outside and kick him to death.
Don't give the UK any more ideas
Like Alex Jones in A Scanner Darkly
where have you been for the last 18 years?
No, I'm sick and tired of ignorant and malicious people holding back much needed progress. Think of where we could be as a civilization without the collective drag of bullshit like that slowing us down.

Fighting ignorance or malicious disinformation campaigns is a constant uphill battle and it's god damned tiresome.
Or to override his veto. I wonder what he would do if that happened.
The only way to fix this problem is with a good turnout at every election from this point on.
> good turn out in November.

I love the optimism of "Now all we have to hope for is that another rich person but this time someone who cares about the populace, comes and fixes everything."


Raise your hand if you remember the 50 times Republicans voted to repeal Obamacare when they knew it would never pass, because they were pandering to their base . . . and then flatly refused to repeal Obamacare when they got the majority in the house.

Grandstanding in Congress is disgusting, from both sides.
Or it's an election year and they need something to pander to their perceived base in the home district
The misinformation in this post is high. If you do work in solar, hello brother/sister, but it would be worth you becoming a little more educated on this topic.

>This started durings Obama’s administration

Suniva filed the initial petition on April 26, 2017. Who was President on April 26, 2017?

>is done by a non partisan commerce authority who crunches numbers and determines these things

It is true that the International Trade Commission initially assesses the situation and provides a recommendation. However the final decision is solely that of the US Trade Representative - [Robert Lighthizer](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Robert_Lighthizer) - a Trump appointee.

>This tariff is targeted at China exclusively

The tariff applies to effectively every meaningful solar producing country in the world. I agree that the intent appears to be more focused on China, but that is not how the tariff is currently written.

>Every other country can get an exception from the tariff

Can they? How? Who has been successful in getting such an exception? Several countries have told the WTO they believe the tariffs are unfair (including China). To date, the tariffs for all these countries remain in place.

>this tariff not only allows a large amount of cheap Chinese panels tariff free

Not true. There is a tariff-free quota on **cells** of 2.5 GW per year, or 2,500 MW. To date - 2.5 months into the tariff - total imports are <50 MW. So no one seems to be using the quota so far. If a Chinese company imports **modules**, they pay the tariffs.

>We don’t want to hand this over to the shady Chinese.

At last, we agree on something!

>people want to spin this as an anti trump thing. He had nothing to do with this.

Boy he sure is [taking credit for it then](https://ustr.gov/about-us/policy-offices/press-office/press-releases/2018/january/president-trump-approves-relief-us). I guess that is nothing new, though.
> Residential rarely uses Chinese panels and if they do, don’t trust that company. 

I thought 100% of solar cells on the market are manufactured in China. Then, 90%+ of panels are assembled in China using those cells. You do get a couple companies manufacturing panels in NA, but they're really just putting together an aluminum and glass frame, they may as well be a picture framing company. 
6% of a $10k install is literally another 600 watts of capacity.  Based on quotes I see around here, that's a good 20% difference in capacity, based on around $2k per installed kW.  
Checking your posts, don’t you live in Berlin? What solar company do you work for? You seem to change your profession often. As someone that ACTUALLY has experience in solar, what you are saying is so wrong to an insidious degree.
Thanks for your insight.  My thoughts on the tariff was to protect American solar manufacturing from illegal Chinese dumping of solar cells, which they are doing with the precise purpose of killing our domestic solar manufacturing. 

The net result of the tariff is an increase in cost for the solar industry as a whole, but I don't see it as an industry-killing hike.  Solar investment is still happening and still profitable.  The long term benefit is saving our domestic manufacturing though, which seems like a worthwhile goal.

Am I mistaken? 
I don't understand why the US doesn't produce panels competively. Much of the production is robotic, so labor costs shouldn't be the issue. 
>  Residential rarely uses Chinese panels 

lol. Nearly everyone uses Chinese panels because they're so cheap, and the quality is in line with other countries.
I work in horse and buggy and tariffs on cars is good!!!

You clearly have a personal bias here which ultimately invalidates your opinion. The reality is Chinese panels are cheaper usually because the lowered cost of labor and lower regulatory environment there not "stealin' muh designs." Protectionism almost never makes sense. Imagine if we put tariffs on all goods made in China? You wouldn't like that yet somehow you think you deserve an exception.

Also residential panels certainly are made in East Asia (jinko, Trina), not that should make a difference. Are non residential uses "evil" or something?
Appreciate the insight! Do you have any source? Id love to learn more before making any decisions.
Why shouldn't we trust a company that uses Chinese manufactured solar panels?  Also why are the Chinese shady?  This seems like a ridiculous blanket statement.
When our company had a product evaluated by the Chinese government, we got it back and could tell they had tried to reverse engineer our shit.  And because one of our competitors is a Chinese state owned company, we can probably guess who's going to be using that stolen technology. Fuck them.
>the shady Chinese

Are you sure you don't mean 

>*the evil triads!*
Seriously. Also many Chinese companies are state owned. It makes it very difficult for a private company to compete with a foreign company that uses tax dollars as revenue. 
Indeed. fighting the tarrifs isn't anti-Trumpism; Obama had even higher tariffs. However, Trump and GOP haven't made any attempt to help establish solar R&amp;D nor infrastructure here in the US with any significant funding. Perhaps they're trying to ensure China won't rip off our IP again, but that lack of funding, makes it all look like a hand out to fossil fuels (because a 3-6% increase in solar costs is significant enough to deter US solar installation). 
No, the bullshit agenda of claiming climate change is a hoax invented by the Chinese and installing climate change deniers in Trump's cabinet. 
Nothing ever is gonna get manufactured here.  US businesses don't want to pay a living wage to anyone if they can help it.

This guy doesn’t Econ 

>You can trust me because I work in solar and my comment has been gilded.


No edit...did...did you gild yourself to try and increase the validity of your post?


At some point companies must realize that their ideas and designs might be stolen when they hand them over to a country with a history of stealing designs and ideas.

Right? 
And have a lack of environmental laws, allowing you to just dump your by products in rivers which flow into the sea impacting the rest of the world.
Everything should be open sourced, anyway. The issue when they steal IP usually isn't to improve, sadly, but to carbon copy shitty iterations for cheap sale/quick profit 
I always feel that America is way too damn strict with intellectual property and copyrights, but my god China is way too fucking lax over it. I feel that a copy of a product is a potentially fine and possibly a good thing, but only if you actually put your own spin on it and genuinely think it makes it better, higher quality, and so on differences instead of trying to trick people or such.
Any examples?  How are the Chinese stealing US IP for solar panels and then importing those panels back into the US?  Doesn't really make any sense.
Tariffs won’t save domestic solar panel manufacturing but they will hurt the many jobs in solar panel installation
Because entire US industries are built around buying some materials from China. I don't want to see a bunch of people losing their jobs.
Sounds like a good idea, although that would be promoting the growth of solar power, which this administration is against.
Incentives on US solar, or tariffs on Chinese solar. Both accomplish the goal, but one doesn't cost tons of money.
And no one should want a 'free' market in that sense. Tariffs allow markets with the best standards to raise the rest of the world up to it's level by providing financial incentive to adopting their same standards in labor, environmental protections, quality control, IP protections, and materials sourcing.

When access to a market is more profitable by adopting the same standards with no tariffs, than cutting all the corners and enduring high tariffs, even developing countries will chose of their own volition to adopt those standards.
You don't put tariffs on someone because they also put tariffs, that's schoolyard logic. You put tariffs when they're convenient (obviously) and there's a justification for doing so (otherwise the WTO will rip you).

If most solar jobs are in installation rather than manufacturing, tariffs actually end up being BAD because now you people have less panels to install and thus less jobs.
Maybe so, but I don't think our economy is ready for tariffs on Chinese products. So many companies and industries rely on stuff from China. The very shop I do IT for buys it's steel from China. If tariffs had been there since the get go, sure, but a sudden change is going to do a lot of short term harm here.
Can you point to any economic research to back this up?
I'm surprised no one has mentioned China is the sole reason that Obama's solar subisidies have failed. Those companies went out of business because even with the extra cheese, the couldn't compete. 

I say keep the tarriffs and let states incentivize.
Don't cheaper panels equal more customers and more customers equal more people that have to install those panels?  Won't the people installing panels have more work when the cost of solar is kept low?
The US has very lax workers protection..you guys don't have health insurance or mat leave or even collective bargaining in many states ..basic things 
Because a few solar panels won't do shit to stop climate change in the short run.  This has been done previously by other countries and it guts U.S. companies.  What do you think will happen when there are no competitors left? Do you think they will keep prices low?  China is not out to help us.  

Look at similar problems from the 1980s. 

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1990/09/30/japan-and-the-big-squeeze/0fb1617e-8756-4390-a776-f1619d59869a/?utm_term=.44c41daf0a70
Exactly.  We don't need more manufacturing jobs.  Keep the costs low and more service jobs will be created.
This. Combating climate change is far more important right now.
I work for a small family owned company that buys Chinese steel, so I'm not sure if your sarcasm applies here.
All of us? I make a good living. My siblings all make good livings. My father made/makes a good living. We are not a rich family.
Eh, what we call slave wages in the US is a far cry from China. Nice whataboutism, though.
But we've got to protect all of the $10 an hour installation jobs! /s
Lets look at the history of IP theft. Lets talk about Samuel Slater.

He memorized the layout of a British textile plant and fled to America to start our textile industry. The father of the american factory system literally stole it.
Most solar jobs in the US are installation, not manufacturing. So if panels now cost more, fewer people buy panels, so there are fewer to install, hurting more jobs than it is saving. I would be for increasing domestic production but this is not the way.
Because when you put Trump's name next to something people get rabid, even if that thing is good.
It is extremely good for the US solar industry. Most redittors do not realize that the Paris agreement created funds in China that would have also boosted Chinese Solar and alternative energy, at a great US expense. 

Hate Trump all you want, but he has done a fantastic job battling bad trade agreements.
It is good for solar panel *production,* but most solar jobs in the US are in installation. In 2017 roughly 130k out of 250k were in installation; only 37k were in manufacturing. So cheaper foreign solar panels is actually BETTER for the majority of solar jobs in the country.

It is not due to Trump being unpopular, as many of his supporters are parroting.

Source: https://www.seia.org/sites/default/files/2018-02/SolarJobsCensus2017_Infographic.pdf
Ignoring the anti trump stuff:
It’s good for us solar production, but bad for us solar installation, at least for short term.

Installation was the more common market in the USA as far as I understand it. Also if you are someone whose primary goal is to increase solar use, you really don’t care where the panels come from as long as people use them (there are numerous problems with that approach, though the problems may not outweigh the benefits)
[There's at least one factory so far that's been 'saved' as a result of the tariffs](http://www.bendbulletin.com/nation/6177156-151/oregon-solar-energy-factory-sold-saving-hundreds-of)

China is a huge market with a lot of pull. Any push back against them economically is going to stir up fear mongering. I'm not educated enough on the topic to say if this is the right answer or not, but we definitely need to do *something* to remain competitive with China.
Because it makes solar panels more expensive, which disincentivizes their use.
Having a service-based economy is not a good long-term prospect as it makes you 100% dependent on upstream economies. 

I also recommend you [read this](https://www.forbes.com/sites/patrickwwatson/2017/11/09/how-the-us-subsidized-china-to-produce-eco-unfriendly-solar-panels/#19b11f45587f): 

> Some of the Asian countries making solar panels for US customers are not particularly “green.” They burn a lot of coal to power the solar-panel factories.

> Solar panels made in Asia are bulky and heavy and come to the US on diesel-burning cargo ships. Portions of these panels even cross the Pacific twice.

> Asian manufacturers import polysilicon, an important raw material, from mines in the United States. Then the same polysilicon comes back to the US in completed panels.

> Experts interviewed by IBT estimate it takes about nine years for an imported solar panel installed on a US roof to recover the greenhouse gas emissions involved in manufacturing and transporting it.

But it's cool, let us subsidize the unethical and environmentally destructive manufacturing and import from an economically and politically aggressive geopolitical foe to the US. One that continually [breaks international IP rules/regs](https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2018-03-22/what-s-intellectual-property-and-does-china-steal-it-quicktake) and has been stealing US-taxpayer subsidized R&D [for years](https://www.aip.org/fyi/2018/theft-us-rd-other-nations-grabs-attention-science-committee).
>  The US solar economy is service based - tons more people employed in installation, sales, policy, etc than in manufacturing.

This is a massive strategic weakness that's harming the US economy, because we've lost control of key capacities and are selling off key infrastructure.

It's also rapidly dropping the quality of the jobs in the US and destroying the middle class.
Ah yes, I was unaware that China found a way to ship the panels at a zero emission footprint as opposed to container ships belching out Supfur and NOx from their use of Bunker C fuel...

You seem to think that the cost isn't important since it's such a critical tipping point for containing climate change, yet you are willing to take the route that's ostensibly cheaper.

But America, with it's rich manufacturing history, of which many quality and innovative products were spawned from, cannot try it's hand at this, and people in such withering fields and trades, these blue collar ruffians, should instead spend their money, or perhaps receive government subsidies to be retrained in a new field. A cost of time (which is precious, as you mentioned) and capital. 

I'm afraid I'm not following. Out one side of your mouth, it seems money is no object, yet the other side is pleading to take the cheaper and less circuitous route. It would appear inconsistent and asinine to assume we cannot add manufacturing to our capacity whilst retaining the service side. Perhaps the product will cost more with the "Made in USA" badge, but the economy is doing well, and the people of our nation would either receive government subsidies, or they were going to spend that money in training of a new career.
I’m not sure where people get the mercantilist view that everything should be made here. Let china flood the us market with cheap solar panel. We don’t need to make the panels themselves, but we do have to install them. Cheap solar means more people buy it which means more people are employed in solar energy installations. If the Chinese want to subsidize the us economy, let them. 
>tons more are employed in the installation than production

Pretty sure that's what we're trying to change. There's a boom. We want to harness the boom to increase us production. I don't think that's a bad thing.
Unfortunately, it's usually the largest markets for a given product (which is generally just the largest markets in general), who have the most impact moving the world forward in this regard.

And in that sense, the US has ***an obligation*** to apply tariffs to restrict access to it's market on the condition of raising other nations to higher standards. The argument should not be over tariffs yea or nay, but on how high the tariffs need to be to encourage reform rather than simply killing the foreign producers and in so doing removing the opportunity for reform.

As China's solar industry seems not to be going anywhere, and domestic production likewise is secured, I'm unconvinced the tariffs are being set inappropriately. Which begs the question to me over this bypartisan legislation; does it stem from ignorance? or maliciousness?
.... YES THAT'S BECAUSE OF OUR POOR TRADE PRACTICES PREVENTING MANUFACTURING 
I've read that two new solar panel factories are planned in USA, so maybe the tariffs are working as intended.
JinkoSolar and Sunpower.
Which brings up a very interesting alternative. Instead of raising tariffs on imports, why not subsidize exports? Make them cheaper for recipients to buy from us.
The idea of the batteries being just-as-harmful as coal/gas is propaganda. Also, putting US on batteries would be insane at a level larger than a neighborhood. But every household having it's own battery storage and solar roof is feasible (in areas where solar is economical).  
  
Also, the birds combusting only happens at molten-salt solar farms. Essentially, there's no 'solar panels' but instead just mirrors that all focus on one point (similar to focusing light with a magnifying glass), the light melts salt in a container in the center and that heat is used to produce electricity. If a bird flies in between the mirror and the salt, it pops. But the number of birds killed is still essentially none when you compare it to the ones harmed from an oil spill or the habitats lost from building dams.  
  
But I agree with your point on diversifying our energy sources.
Nearly everything you wrote is simply false.
The biggest costs for most companies is labor. The US cant compete with their slave wages.
It's not a lack of innovation that's stifling the US companies it's the high price of their products compared to China (who use extremely low wages). And innovation won't help much when China is allowed to steal your intellectual property.

I believe in a free market but the only other way for US manufacturers to compete would be to pay their workers lower wages than the chinese and punish all Chinese businesses that steal our tech 
It's not a lack of innovation that's stifling the US companies it's the high price of their products compared to China (who use extremely low wages). And innovation won't help much when China is allowed to steal your intellectual property.

I believe in a free market but the only other way for US manufacturers to compete would be to pay their workers lower wages than the chinese and punish all Chinese businesses that steal our tech 
It's not a lack of innovation that's stifling the US companies it's the high price of their products compared to China (who use extremely low wages). And innovation won't help much when China is allowed to steal your intellectual property.

I believe in a free market but the only other way for US manufacturers to compete would be to pay their workers lower wages than the chinese and punish all Chinese businesses that steal our tech 
Those numbers are in the article but they're not saying the same thing you are saying. 

Those numbers are the total number of people employed. Who's to say that the tarrif wouldn't keep the number of installations jobs the same and manfacturing jobs would double. Also, when the panels are manufactured here, it stimulates the economy more because the raw materials would likely be purchased here, the factories that create the panels would have to buy real estate and machinery, workers would be paid here and spend their money here, etc...



True. It takes disaster to snap people out of it. Somehow we’re not there yet.
True. It takes disaster to snap people out of it. Somehow we’re not there yet.
There are a ton of comments here about how Chinese companies steal the intellectual property of US companies and then produce the same products at slave wages. US companies can't compete with that without lowering the minimum wage to the same that those Chinese workers are paid, which would be insane. Until China starts respecting US intellectual property laws, the tariffs are necessary. This allows US solar companies to continue innovating, which is good for the solar industry as a whole, otherwise it will just stagnate with the same products.

I can't believe you people are defending Chinese sweatshops just to try to be more anti-Trump.

Edit: Maybe the reason you haven't seen any comments supporting the tariffs "in like the top 50" is because the sweatshop supporters just downvote them, like this one.
Of course, the tariff on solar panels helped that along.
Gas is also a lot better than coal, and if we aren’t putting in more nuclear plants is definitely the way to go to bridge the gap with renewables. 
from the "i didnt read the article and don't understand the greater game at play" guy
>This so this.  They seem to think if we make solar more expensive that suddenly people will want coal again.  They forget that the plants are nearing eol and that the cost to mine and ship it make it more expensive than solar or wind per kw. So they don’t seem to understand how the actual market forces have helped move away from coal and not the evil Obama.  
>
>
>The fun fact is gas plants are on the rise due to cheap supply and cheap to build plants connected to pipelines for ease of transit.  Thanks Obama.  lol 

Well, obviously this means that the coal industry needs subsidies!
Uh, who hates America in this fantasy of yours?
Competition is only fair and productive when every player has to follow the same rules. It's why monopolies form in the first place. 

Do you honestly think China plays by the rules where industry is concerned?
I mean... I understand getting rid of these tariffs, but the problem is that Chinese companies don’t spend any money in R&D and simply would just remove the label and sell them as their own and they pull the profits.

You can’t be competitive if all your tech is stolen and sold at a lower price than yours.
This is correct. Let's stop caring who makes the panels, we need to scale up renewable energy and we need to do it fast and cheap. Let China make the panels, we can focus on selling, financing, and installing.
Production, yes. Installation, no. That's why this tariff was criticized when it was first introduced.

Installation jobs make up a huge percentage of the solar industry in the US and US manufacturers can't supply enough panels to keep the technicians busy. 
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rare_earth_industry_in_China
I mean, I read and agreed to it. 

But we just dump all our bottles in the neighbors. 
Id rather vomit uneducated opinions but thanks for your feedback
We can only hope for a tragic golf accident until then
Sure have considered them... and so did Congress and the Justice Department who spent years of investigation.

Found nothing.

Debunk Anti-Hillary Lies, Conspiracies - http://www.forwardprogressives.com/debunking-anti-hillary-clinton-myths-lies-conspiracies/

Trump deleting emails: http://thehill.com/blogs/ballot-box/presidential-races/283331-lawsuit-accused-trump-organization-of-deleting-emails

Trump’s email problems: http://www.politicususa.com/2016/06/13/argument-republicans-hillary-clinton-dead-trump-destroyed-emails.html

Trump/Clinton PolitiFact: http://www.politifact.com/truth-o-meter/lists/people/comparing-hillary-clinton-donald-trump-truth-o-met/


Funny, but this is literally in support of Trump’s actions.
.. all of which Trump has consistently ignored by failing to put his business interest into a blind trust.
Laws have never stopped Trump before. 
He hasn't cared about the emoluments clause yet so why would he care about any other laws between him and money?
Solar manufactured in China is extremely wasteful. Nuclear might costs more, but it is much more cleaner than manufacturing solar panels and then transporting them around the world using cargo ships. Do you understand that manufacturing and transporting solar panels causes global pollution to rise? And by encouraging the market to increase, you're encouraging further pollution elsewhere? 

Solar is not the answer and not helping the environment at all. Wind and hydroeletric are fine energy sources, but solar is misunderstood by many to be helping the environment. When in fact manufacturing and transporting solar panels continues the pollution. 
We have to change the manufacturing process if you want it to be cleaner.  
The waste is containable. 
It's because we are so fat.
All of the varying belts actually came about thanks to the popularity of karate movies.
Yeah Nomura's great great grandfather designed the U.S.
It’s just missing an ungodly amount of zippers to really seal the deal
Or Tommy Wiseau. 
[Obligitory](http://finalfantasy.wikia.com/wiki/Lulu?file=FFX_Lulu_Art.png)
Take this Gold to Mother, Brother.
[!redditsilver](http://f.thumbs.redditmedia.com/wPjOQrGRacUELOnM.png) 
"I'm wearing lots of belts...for no reason at all" - USA probably 
Something something it's free real estate
You cannot defeat me for I have the Bible Belt!
Oh hai Mark
Iron belt ran out of durability, rust belt has way worse stats except plus a bunch to murders.  
When corrupt greediness works in your favor. I guess it’s something
The people trying to stop it are those that have their entire fortune tied into fossil fuel. You would think they would try to move their portfolio to be more diverse with solar.  But let’s face it, it’s probably people like trump who inherited everything and don’t know how to actually run a business or properly invest. 
Yeah. This is why I wasn't upset at all at Trump appointing him the head of the DoE. He did great work here in Texas towards making us a powerhouse in wind and solar energy generation. I may not agree with him on anything else, politically, but if you had to choose a right-wing nutjob to head that department, he is definitely the right guy.

Disclaimer: I'm politically somewhere off to the left of mainstream Democrats, but I'm not afraid to agree with someone when they're right, no matter who or where they are. 
I think he said it because Democrats are generally assumed to support green tech so that part isn't so surprising.
You know there's a conference of colleges called the Sunbelt Conference, right? It's actually a thing.
I imagine after November he may be exceedingly frustrated if the blue wave can produce a congressional landscape capable of creating veto proof legislation. Trump would likely flip his shit at the realization that the separation of powers keeps him from being emperor.
It's pretty easy to answer that one. He would blame Obama, do some whataboutism regarding Hillary, say fake news was at fault, and tell everybody that by violating his will, they are giving  America to evil Mexican criminals.

Or, whatever Fox News tells him to say.

Or, he'll go golfing.
Lose. His. Shit.
So if a congressman tries to support legislation their voters support they are just "pandering"?  If you take cynicism too far it's just not useful.
Son of a bitch now I don't know who to believe
From dec 17, 2014.  Obama was president at this time.

https://www.nytimes.com/2014/12/17/business/energy-environment/-us-imposes-steep-tariffs-on-chinese-solar-panels.html
**Robert Lighthizer**

Robert Emmet Lighthizer (; born October 11, 1947) is an American attorney and government official who is the current United States Trade Representative. After he graduated from Georgetown University Law Center in 1973, Robert Lighthizer joined the firm of Covington and Burling in Washington, D.C. He left the firm in 1978 to serve as chief minority counsel and later staff director and chief of staff of the Senate Committee on Finance under Chairman Bob Dole. In 1983, Robert Lighthizer was unanimously confirmed by the U.S. Senate to serve as Deputy U.S. Trade Representative for President Ronald Reagan. In 1985, Lighthizer joined the Washington office of Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP as a partner and led the firm's international trade group.

***

^[ [^PM](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=kittens_from_space) ^| [^Exclude ^me](https://reddit.com/message/compose?to=WikiTextBot&message=Excludeme&subject=Excludeme) ^| [^Exclude ^from ^subreddit](https://np.reddit.com/r/technology/about/banned) ^| [^FAQ ^/ ^Information](https://np.reddit.com/r/WikiTextBot/wiki/index) ^| [^Source](https://github.com/kittenswolf/WikiTextBot)   ^]
^Downvote ^to ^remove ^| ^v0.28
The solar tariff has been looked into for ages and ages. Probably several years. That court case just sped up the urgency to take action. I was talking about this while I was in Berlin so that was before Trump. 

And yes they can get an exemption but it doesn’t happen overnight. Government regulators, especially in trade, take a while. 


I work in solar distribution for one of the top distributors in the US. He is 100 percent wrong to say that 90% of residential installations don't use Chinese modules. 
If we are getting technical the tariff is on the cells, not the panels, which is why the net impact is so low, and why it just incentives better solar cell technology development in countries that protect innovation. The panels right now most are using in residential are from NA and Korea with LGs (the lg panels are the best bang for the buck)
China dominates, no doubt. But they are not the only producer. Cells are also made in Korea, Taiwan, Thailand, Singapore, Malaysia, Philippines, India, Turkey... there is not much US cell production capacity, though.
This is the comment that made me question his entire post. I have very limited knowledge on solar, but most of the people I know who installed it, installed Chinese panels because of the lower cost vs. U.S./Canadian-made. That's bs and makes me question his post. 
It’s 3 for residential which is where the boom is coming. The early adopter stage is clearing out and ultimately I don’t think 3 points will be that much of a hindrance considering the only thing holding people back is comfort with new technology rather than savings since it’s already there. 
> Checking your posts, don’t you live in Berlin?

Which of his posts seems to suggest that?

>As someone that ACTUALLY has experience in solar, what you are saying is so wrong to an insidious degree.

What has he said wrong specifically, and for what reasons is it wrong?
I used to live in Berlin. I’m working for another startup in the USA involving residential solar. 
So the proper economist/libertarian* response is that a tariff is still bad (and causes a [deadweight loss](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Deadweight_loss)). If China wishes to subsidize solar cells, then the people of China are actually paying to better the planet and reduce the cost of solar energy. 

Comparative advantages works to everybody's benefit. The US can continue to specialize in things like healthcare and education (where China sends a bunch of their grads over for) while China specializes in Solar manufacturing. Everybody wins.

*the idealist kind, not the republican who loves weed kind
Because if you can't compete with China then there is no need to waste money trying. The tariffs actually incentivize production in the US.
Honestly, it's because the Chinese Gov't subsidized their panels to the tune of 30 billion to bankrupt our companies. 
This is more about preparing for the future. The USA wants be competitive in this space and a leader. Is it not a good idea for a country which wants to compete to legislate protective measures while it develops? Or should the USA just innovate then hand it off to China? 
Because corporate espionage. All that tech they use is stolen. It’s only one parent manufacturer in all of China and soon as we develop something they steel the tech. 
Lol wut?  That makes no sense and you  haven't presented anything to back that opinion up.  
They just invested a 100m in early funding for new Solar tech. It’s how government works where they fund in stages and increase based on success. 

But yeah 3% can make a difference but residential solar already had healthy margins so it’s not much of a deterrent. Not for us at least. 
>a 3\-6&#37; increase in solar costs is significant enough to deter US solar installation

If that's all it takes to deter solar installation, then maybe solar isn't ready for prime time.
No one can live on min wage alone.

A lot of companies have moved to full temp agency use for new hires so they can send them packing with no fall out.

Look at the amount they are discussing for Basic Income.  That will barely pay for a single bedroom apartment in most areas.  Still not enough to live on.  

Inflation is not slowing down, but a lot of wages did years ago.  Companies who haven't improved their processes in 30 years.  But, they will continually ask you to work harder for the same money to cover the work load.  

Greed.
So you support China companies paying slave wages to make solar products? What a hypocrite.
My USA company manufactures engineered marine equipment primarily sold to China and Korea.  We do much better than our Chinese competitors because we compete on minimizing opex, rather than capex. Yes, China can make it cheaper, but we bring much better value to our customers.

The US economy can't really compete on simple manufactured things, but there is still plenty of market left for more advanced products. 

I forgot to add, we still sell to China even though they have a 40% tariff on our goods. 
Obviously, but corporations are run by CEOs who receive much of their pay as stock options. Opening the Chinese market gives their stock a short term boost. Intellectual property theft is a long term problem for the next CEO. Which is why the government has to get involved.
That's a Next Quarter problem, not a This Quarter problem.
Short term profit is what drives america
Sure, but it’s literally required to operate in China. So the options are to not operate there (which is bad for the entire company) or play by their rules.
There is no might, it's a requirement to do business in China. I wish companies had the balls to refuse to do business there. It's hard to push for changes on this front when the big players willfully engage in it.
This sentence could apply just a well to the US as China. Clean coal anyone?
Sometimes the right thing to do for the long term causes short term pain.
Fucking Christ that is so fucking stupid and makes NO sense, who the fuck benefits from that??
No, no this administration is not against promotion of solar and alternative energy, and neither are "Red States" generally. Texas is a great example of the boom in solar, and these tarrifs are another prime example.

You're right that is a great idea, and that includes the tariffs: for years we've institued broad worker protections which have driven up our labor costs, and that has allowed countries without such standards to undercut us across the board. If we're going to keep those worker protections (and we should) we need to control and protect the market those workers sell. Such is the harsh reality of globalization.
I think the idea is imposing mirror tariffs in hopes that the chinese will start to take down their tariffs leading to a better outcome for the USA. It may be working:

https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.bbc.com/news/amp/business-43800233
There already are tariffs on China. We have had them for a very long time. 
So the solution is to have no tariffs and become even _more_ dependent? Solar is still and emerging industry in that it's demand today is a fraction of what it will be in 10 or 20 years.

Don't you think it's a good idea to create a level playing field NOW so domestic production can financially compete and grow? And to give China a financial incentive to adopt more stringent labor and environmental protections?
When labor costs are higher in one place, the producers will choose the other. Without market barriers (tariffs), those cheaper goods  will dominate and the higher paid workers will be displaced.

Start with the first lessons from economics (not joking) or numerous case studies for places like the Rust Belt.
I for one, am glad that you did (mention why Obama's incentives (alone) didn't have the desired result)
Yes, they definitely will. But that's one job type and a robust domestic economy should include vertical supply integration (resource harvesting, manufacturing/finishing, distribution, installation, service) and should consider how all those sectors are affected by flooding the market with cheap goods (what we're doing now).

Further, we don't need to lower the price to that extent to find demand: the adoption of solar is well on it's way, and the idea that will reverse itself from US based manufacturing is incorrect.


I'm more talking about companies like Apple that manufacture their products in China.
Out of curiosity, would you be morally opposed to sourcing American steel at the same price if it was produced by American workers working in the same conditions as the Chinese, for the same low wages, from a state that gutted environmental and IP protections to allow that company to reach the same price point?
You all don't work under anybody? 
Who knew reputation matters?
And those same people spread information and then both about Russian trolls. Both them (and the trolls) are fucking it up for the rest of us. 
It is good for US solar production, but not the industry. 

The vast majority of jobs in US solar (80+%) are in instalation. When solar is cheap, more people buy installations, which means more jobs. 

Like it or not, China undercutting US prices increased the number of installation jobs more than it decreased the number of production jobs. These tariffs will cause the price of solar to go up by increasing the price of Chinese panels. This will reduce demand and installation jobs more than it will help production. 

So, US solar production will see slightly better business, but the industry as a whole will lose jobs. 
Unfortunately (as already mentioned) if you put Trump next to any article on Reddit, it's mob mentality 
What middle class? Obviously anecdotal, but I don't know anyone personally that makes enough to be considered middle class. And you aren't going to be making middle class money in a factory building panels. There is definitely a problem here, and it's not importing manufactured goods. 
You know tariffs don't make our stuff cheaper, it just makes theirs more expensive. If ours cost too much for people to want to buy it, this won't change that - just fewer people will be involved with solar at all.
No one is building panels in America. That's the problem, and if they are they're not very large. 
Never said batteries were just as harmful as gas or coal. I was just stating there are more efficient options available. Our battery technology and solar panel efficiency isn't at the point to warrant this huge push to make solar and wind the standard. But like I said it's a great option for personal use to cut down on monthly bills with a higher upfront investment.
I don't understand, I gave three examples of more efficient energy than solar and covered a bunch of other stuff what exactly is false?
what about the spontaneously combusting birds?

At any rate,
nuclear not appealing unless the plant could be on venus.
Nuclear is one of the cleanest forms of energy.
If by clean you mean only looking at carbon oxides then obviously yes.
It’s sad that you’re getting downvotes. I’m a liberal and we’ve been pushing for tariffs forever. Now suddenly because trump is advocating it all the young liberals are against it. It really feels like we’re in some trouble as a country.
It’s sad that you’re getting downvotes. I’m a liberal and we’ve been pushing for tariffs forever. Now suddenly because trump is advocating it all the young liberals are against it. It really feels like we’re in some trouble as a country.
Tariff on solar helped existing energy producers
of all flavors as it stopped the easy and rapid roll out of solar to meet new and current peak demands.  
Combined cycle natural gas costs less than half as much as nuclear. Wind and solar (PV, not thermal) are also cheaper than nuclear, but obviously have issues with variability.

[Levelized cost of electricity generation](https://imgur.com/a/0IDIBFZ)

https://www.eia.gov/outlooks/aeo/electricity_generation.php
nuclear takes so damned long to come online that frankly it's too late for nuclear to bridge the gap.
Yep. We need to roll back the miner health and safety regulations and provide tax breaks for new seams of coal found since we need it so bad.  This is the dumbest thing I think I have ever seen the gop do.  They could equally make the red state left behind folks happy with a new greener jobs initiative with training and juicy tax breaks.  That was not the way they went.  I live in the south and down here the local government had enough and started a program to help miners code in Kentucky / Tennessee.  The ex miners are happier safer and would never go back.  So yeah you can create alternative ways to make the lives of those impacted by the loss of a nasty and bad for Mother Earth industry and do it in the gop favorite way tax cuts.  They just decided to triple down on global warming is a hoax.  This will end up hurting them one day.  
Probably the people that insist jobs "aren't coming back" when they get outsourced and then throwing a shitfit when someone tries to actually protect American workers and jobs and encourage businesses to stay in country or come back.
**Rare earth industry in China**

The rare earth industry in China is a large industry that is important to Chinese internal economics. Rare earths are a group of elements on the periodic table with similar properties. Rare earth metals are used to manufacture everything from electric or hybrid vehicles, wind turbines, consumer electronics and other clean energy technologies. The elements are also important to national governments because they are used in the defense industry.

***

^[ [^PM](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=kittens_from_space) ^| [^Exclude ^me](https://reddit.com/message/compose?to=WikiTextBot&message=Excludeme&subject=Excludeme) ^| [^Exclude ^from ^subreddit](https://np.reddit.com/r/technology/about/banned) ^| [^FAQ ^/ ^Information](https://np.reddit.com/r/WikiTextBot/wiki/index) ^| [^Source](https://github.com/kittenswolf/WikiTextBot)   ^]
^Downvote ^to ^remove ^| ^v0.28
Fuck no, the Vice President is even worse
Tolerant Liberal: #lovetrumpshate

Also Tolerant Liberal: Hope Trump dies in a accident. 

😂🤣😂 

I can only hope you have a tragic golf accident.
If you watch cnn I’m sure you think that. 
contractor in NYC, 

know that.


Where do you plan storing all of the waste? Nuclear energy sounds good, but it comes with issues that no other energy source has. Not to mention the waste involved building the plant. Building new nuclear power plants is extremely expensive, and there's a lot of hoops companies have to jump through to actually build one. Many plants change hands multiple times before they're operational. 

Nuclear reactors lead to nuclear weapons, so you're for every nation getting nukes? Not to mention countries adopting nuclear power will have struggles with safe design and operation. Again, there's the issue of where and how to store the waste.

I work in the nuclear industry, and I was pro nuclear until I got a first hand look at it.
You are incorrect. 
Since you're so concerned with transportation pollution you should be talking about the low hanging fruit; food: grain trucked to cows, cows trucked to slaughter, their meat trucked to markets; not to mention the cars, car parts, tennis shoes, TVs, computers, clothing and the billions of tons of other stuff we import. Solar panels by themselves are a tiny drop in that bucket. The only one btw that threatens nuke, coal, and oil & gas revenue streams. That's the real reason for the solar tariff.

I'm happy to let china subsidize the cost of my solar panels because I believe we need more solar installed. Talking about them being too dirty is patently stupid. Let's go ask the residents of Fukushima prefecture what they think shall we?
Maybe we should move to suspenders
When everyone is fat, we’re just “fat”. 
[deleted]
That's called Mexico. 
Ahaha, what a country, George!
That's what I was looking for!
Obligatory spelling correction
Why is she obligatory?
Thanks friend!
Bullshit.
I'm giving it Gold.
Watch this.
I was anticipating the Manning picture (or whatever it's called), TBH.
Stop doing this.
That's literally the foundation of capitalism.  The hope that the quest for money will generate productive outcomes. 
If saving the environment ever becomes profitable, environmental damage will stop immediately. People will start trying to reverse the damage already done. Money money money! There'll finally be some *motivation.* Because I guess survival of our species isn't enough.
That's literally the whole reason why capitalism works and communism doesn't.
The smart ones have. Lots of capital for building wind farms has come from the fortunes of oil giants. 
That's going to be almost impossible.  It takes a 2/3rds majority to override a veto.  Considering the GOP is at 51 Senate seats currently and only 9 are up for election, the Dems would have to sweep the election in an unprecedented landslide, plus Trump would have to be toxic enough that almost 1/4 of his own party started regularly voting with the Democrats...  
Trump would likely just change his mind on all current stances to get the W
The separation of powers would be news to him, too.
That's simply not going to happen.  It's nearly impossible to get a 2/3rds majority to vote on something and overriding a veto has only happened a handful of times before.  The last time it happened, it was to allow Americans to sue other countries for the 9/11 attacks and Obama vetoed it *with the expectation that congress would overturn his veto* (it was an international relations move to allow Obama to save face while actually supporting the bill, which is why it was a unanimous vote to override).

Worse, since the last election the democrats have continued to alienate anyone who isn't already a left-leaning voter.  They've done nothing but double and tripple-down on their name-calling and vitriol directed squarely at all republican-voting citizens.  Rather than address the concerns of the right head-on, they've just ignored complaints and called them all "racist, sexist, deplorable".  There are so many better ways to engage right-leaning and moderate voters, but the democrats seem to have it in their minds that they can insult their way to victory.  On top of that, they've decided to attack gun control like never before at one of the most politically divisive times in history. There are a *huge* number of voters that would vote democrat in a heartbeat if only the democrats would stop introducing legislation to ban guns.  Gun control is a horribly divisive issue, so concentrating on it is a perfect way to alienate anyone who wasn't already going to vote for you.  And, of course, there's the fact that we're talking about midterm elections here.  Even fewer people vote in the midterms than they do in the generals, and republicans always vote in higher percentages than democrats.

Oh yeah, there's also the fact that it's mathematically impossible for this to happen.  Only 9 republican seats are up for election in the senate and they control 51 seats.  So even if the democrats won them all, they still wouldn't have a 2/3rds majority.

It's very likely that the republicans will maintain about the same number of seats that they have now, or possibly wind up with a net gain of a few.  I'm sorry to be the one to have to tell you this, but there's no "blue wave" headed for congress in the midterms.
He could also flip his position, and say he never said or did everything he has done.

And when presented with the recordings, say "it wasn't me."

Edit: spelling
You forgot the part where after all that he'd proclaim victory and his supporters would cheer. 
You can't choose because both of them are lacking sources for most of their claims. Just gonna have to research yourself this time.
Yeah anybody who’s remotely involved in the industry knows that you don’t bid with anything but Chinese panels unless it’s stated explicitly otherwise you’ll lose the bid 99% of the time
I'm just gonna paste a response by /u/Bcp01scu05

The misinformation in this post is high. If you do work in solar, hello brother/sister, but it would be worth you becoming a little more educated on this topic.

>This started durings Obama’s administration

Suniva filed the initial petition on April 26, 2017. Who was President on April 26, 2017?

>is done by a non partisan commerce authority who crunches numbers and determines these things

It is true that the International Trade Commission initially assesses the situation and provides a recommendation. However the final decision is solely that of the US Trade Representative - Robert Lighthizer - a Trump appointee.

>This tariff is targeted at China exclusively

The tariff applies to effectively every meaningful solar producing country in the world. I agree that the intent appears to be more focused on China, but that is not how the tariff is currently written.

>Every other country can get an exception from the tariff

Can they? How? Who has been successful in getting such an exception? Several countries have told the WTO they believe the tariffs are unfair (including China). To date, the tariffs for all these countries remain in place.

>this tariff not only allows a large amount of cheap Chinese panels tariff free

Not true. There is a tariff-free quota on cells of 2.5 GW per year, or 2,500 MW. To date - 2.5 months into the tariff - total imports are <50 MW. So no one seems to be using the quota so far. If a Chinese company imports modules, they pay the tariffs.

>We don’t want to hand this over to the shady Chinese.

At last, we agree on something!

>people want to spin this as an anti trump thing. He had nothing to do with this.

Boy he sure is taking credit for it then. I guess that is nothing new, though.
Here’s his comment from a year ago saying that he now resides in Berlin (granted this was from a year ago). 

https://www.reddit.com/r/Entrepreneur/comments/50oklb/so_my_business_a_few_months_ago_went_from_55k/?st=JG9M7ECS&sh=b0ed43c4

As for what he’s wrong about, it’s more tricky. The majority of his facts are right, but his numbers are off. The “3%-6% increase in price” comment is wrong, due to the the fact that his “most solar installations don’t use Chinese panels” comment is wrong. Chinese panels are typically the best option for solar installations, considering how much cheaper they are. Now I can understand the point that American-based solar manufacturers need time and R&D to be able to compete, but I think there’s some serious overestimating about how close we are to be able to do that. Chinese labor and materials are just so much cheaper, our panels would have to become immensely more efficient in order to be able to compete with Chinese-produced solar panels.
Wow sounds like you’re doing lots of stuff. Are we going to find out next week that you’re also working for a [insert industry relevant to reddit thread] company?
**Deadweight loss**

A deadweight loss, also known as excess burden or allocative inefficiency, is a loss of economic efficiency that can occur when equilibrium for a good or a service is not achieved. That can be caused by monopoly pricing in the case of artificial scarcity, an externality, a tax or subsidy, or a binding price ceiling or price floor such as a minimum wage.

***

^[ [^PM](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=kittens_from_space) ^| [^Exclude ^me](https://reddit.com/message/compose?to=WikiTextBot&message=Excludeme&subject=Excludeme) ^| [^Exclude ^from ^subreddit](https://np.reddit.com/r/technology/about/banned) ^| [^FAQ ^/ ^Information](https://np.reddit.com/r/WikiTextBot/wiki/index) ^| [^Source](https://github.com/kittenswolf/WikiTextBot)   ^]
^Downvote ^to ^remove ^| ^v0.28
"Everybody wins", right. Except American solar companies being crushed by an unfairly subsidized chinese monopoly. What do you imagine happens when China holds the entire industry? 
These are bullshit leading questions and you know it. All of our CPUs and smartphones are made in East Asia. We "handed" them the designs. Yet here we are. Intel, amd, and apple rule these markets not the bogeyman of  chinaco.
Everything comes from China. Pay more for shit. Oh you won't? Well here we are then
Wich, unfortunately, is in stark contrast to the idea of negative freedom and small government that is so prevalent in American (western) politics.
That's so backwards and dumb lol 
The USA gained a foothold in the textile business by stealing technologies from the British. We can complain all we want now that we are the leader but we need to at least recognize our roots.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Samuel_Slater
Using a technique or invention from a US patent isn't theft when you're not in the US and you don't honour us patents
Everything wrong with the modern corporation, in a nutshell.
Agreed. In principle it could, though it's a more complex equation as the product of 'clean coal' (electricity) isn't being directly exported. You'd have to tariff the whole of US manufactured goods, and would only work when exporting to markets with higher pollution standards. It's generally a better idea to keep tariffs narrow in scope though, as it's easier to turn a sail boat (a single industry) than the titanic (the entire manufacturing of the US)

Out competing coal for energy production seems to be the more viable route for reform, and the key to that is removing subsidies and the like that keeps coal afloat. However, that must be done with extreme care as entire communities are reliant on coal for their existence.

That perhaps, ought to be pushed as the next big challenge to put on the plate of US legislature (rather than repealing US tariffs on Chinese solar production) as removing the incentive for coal by finding a solution for those communities would create the exact sort of demand for solar that domestic manufacturing are salivating for.
I’m sure the people on the unemployment line appreciate being there for the greater good.
The rotting corpse of the coal industry.
Why, the coal miners do, sir.
Some people think the free market should pick the winners and losers instead of the government.
You are straight up wrong.  I have been watching as the Trump digs coal and the oil powered Trump train have systematically attacked the value proposition of solar power.  They have done so under various guises, the 30% tariff at the federal level, but also the House passed Tax overhaul reduced both wind and solar tax treatment in favor of a production tax credit for new coal plants.  In my state they are working 2 bills.  One to cut the taxes, the other to unfavorably change the regulated utilities agreements.  The combined effect of these changes are to make solar power unappealing from an economic standpoint.  Every one of these policies are driven by elected republicans.  
Trump's daddy has a big interest in oil. Possibly in the pocket of big coal as well. 
I honestly don't think that link agrees with your interpretation. They're opening it up so investors can now own more than 50% of local ventures. Thats a power play to get investors more heavily invested in the chinese markets further pulling them away from the US.

In fact the very end of that article talks about the Sorghum problems going on right now.
But they're disproportionate to what China imposes on us. That's the trouble.
My professor would say that "tariffs don't exist yet, ignore them" >_>.. You're totally correct, but my professor would selectively apply ethics and the idea that there must always be a free market and that prices must always rise was ingrained into the class... it was a microeconomics class ffs
Also the first lesson in economics is that tariffs are never a benefit except for an exclusive group at the cost of everyone else.
Morality doesn't usually come into play when it comes to buying goods from a foreign country for a business.
I guess I have a boss I rarely see. But most of us are relatively high level. Besides, "working under" someone does imply that a worker is a slave. It means that the department is managed from the top down.
Nobody knew positive brand recognition was so difficult.
It goes far beyond reputation, though - and can reach a level of blind following sometimes.

You can attribute the exact same policy / action to Obama and Trump and people's opinions on it will vary wildly. 
US should be a leader in clean energy. We should not be using Chinese panels that are made with no care of environmental conditions.
change is going to be painful, but if it doesn't get done we will be owned by china. They and their unfair trade practices will not only have all  the manufacturing jobs but they will own all the patents. Needing to think about tomorrow at some point for are kids and not always for what's comfortable and fat for today. They have been blackmailing us for our technology using our exports as a bargaining chip. Meanwhile, have been letting them export everything under the sun including the kitchen sink. Making us dependant on the manufacturing. And what do we do? Sale them land. 
So the US is losing solar installation jobs in exchange for solar production?

That seems like a win.
How?
Because being able to produce your own infrastructure is a security concern, and the US is pretty flush with things like installation jobs -- in fact, the trades are presently understaffed and can't find enough workers.

By contrast, we lack things like solar manufacturing after an orgy of offshoring -- to the point it's a real concern for the technology tree of the US. We *can't* produce what we need.
and the poster you're replying to is a perfect example of mob mentality; he's a regular t_d poster. 
I'm not talking specifically about solar panels, but about an alternative way to manage trade inequities without imposing tariffs, but getting a similar kind of gain that doesn't immediately look like a slap in the face to one country or another. In fact, in effect we would be making our goods cheaper for the rest of the world, a move that would be popular, and not be as directly confrontational as tariffs are.
You only get tax write offs if the panels are American.
Plus failure possible outcomes can be potentially catastrophic
 
We also need to ban large machinery on coal sites. Can't have 1 excavator taking the job of 80 men!
You are an idiot. Jobs that left have left because you can essentially get child slave labor in some other country to do it. You want jobs back? Then compete with that, personally I would rather not try to make our children work for 1$ a day
Liberals are not tolerant of fascism. 
We are all tragic golf accidents on this blessed day
Where they're currently stored, in abandoned mines in the Sierra mountains. 

The uranium used for weapons requires further enrichment with specialized equipment. Sure it could happen, just like it happened in Iran with Russian nuclear reactors. But similar to Iran, took them years to turn energy uranium into weapon grade uranium. Not as easy as simply putting nuclear reactor uranium and placing it in a missile. There would be some time to hopefully stop whoever is building the bomb. Just like our state department did in America, we sent a virus into Iranian labs and destoryed their supply. 

Nuclear, when done peacefully, is extremely beneficial. Just have to stop bad actors from using the technology against others. 
You mean Yucca Mountain? It's been closed for years. The waste that is being stored by DOE is in Carlsbad New Mexico in temporary storage. We literally have tons of nuclear waste that's being stored in different forms of temporary storage without a definitive long term plan for it. 
About what specifically? That solar panels grow on trees without any waste? You're ignoring science and economic laws to push an unnecessary energy source. 
Because those massive toxic pools of chemicals outside of the solar panel plants in China are great for the environment.
The I-5 and I-95 suspenders hold up our Mexican pants.
For my back problems, suspenders have been such a huge help. Nerve pinches hit me right at the belt line. 
Would that mean we're counting on Canada to save us from embarrassment? That seems about right. 
Jian Yang?
..uh.... anyone wanna switch seats?
this was a quality threadling until you showed up
Your welcome!
Enjoy!
I saw this happening live like I was at the Olympic podium ceremony
Stop doing that.
!redditgarlic
...why?
No matter how many dead and buried along the way!
I think we reach a point, if he's still president after the mid-terms, where the republicans start leaving him like full ticks falling off a dying deer.  They got what they want and continuing to support him will only hurt them, so the last 12-18 months before the 2020 election they will oppose him in the hopes that people didn't notice them gargling his balls for the previous 2 years.
Very long shot but it helps that many many of them will "retire", be appointed elsewhere, diddle a kid, etc. between 2018 and 2020 elections. 
Well at that point there is really no reason for him to do such a thing. If he decided to flip a bunch of his stances on things to garner support from the more liberal minded population he would just show what a shill he is, no one if flipping over sides to support him in a re-election. 

To be honest, I highly doubt Trump could sway any new voters into supporting him if they are not currently one of his followers. Most people willing to suck his dick atm are greedy, not stupid. He still has an above 50% approval rating from his main encampment, so if he could ride out the last two years and keep a strangle hold on the flyover states, it’s possible he could squeeze through once again. Those reasons and because some people like to be contrary and watch as the world burns.
I don't think anybody he allows near him, nor any media he consumes other than Twitter, ever presents his past statements to him.
Are any entirely us made?
Which is probably why the tariffs were put in in the first place, huh
. . . So that consumers would have to pay much more for an inferior product?
Yeah man, everything just straight up 'POOFS!' out of that giant factory labelled 'CHINA' out east, with no consideration for the material, human or shipping industries related to it here in good ol' 'Murica.

Listen, GAC is looking to sell here next year, but they're having some troubles with these niggling NHTSA "crash standards"...whatever that means.

I'm sure they could use a bit more intelligent crash test dummy.
I'm sorry if I'm misunderstanding but if you're trying to rationalize slave labor then all I can do is laugh. 
Yes it is. It’s in the free trade agreements we signed with other countries. It just isn’t enforced. Yet.
If a business wants to open shop in China, they really have no choice but to "partner" with an existing company thanks to Chinese regulations protecting domestic industry. As a result, after a time, the Chinese "partner" begins to use information they obtained through their partnership for themselves, essentially conducting corporate espionage sanctioned by the Chinese government.

Every US company that opens shop in China knows this happens, but the additional profits from paying slave wages and nonexistent worker protections means the risk is worth it. Companies want the best of both worlds: they want the benefits of having no US protections for their workers, while having US protections for themselves and their IP. Fuck 'em. They want the benefits of slave wages, they get the risks of losing their IP.
And one reason privatisation doesn't necessarily lead to increased efficiency.
It's also why voting with your dollar can be powerful
Let me get this straight. Its okay for us to use coal because entire communities rely on it. But when Chinese communities rely on something its too bad for them they need to clean up?
I'm sure the people on the unemployment line would like to see less unemployment in the future, not more.
Welcome to the real fucking world dude.  Every decision hurts someone.  There are no magical golden bullets that solve everything with no side effects
I know you’re being sarcastic, but god damn, those jobs are never coming back. Unless you somehow managed to kill the growth of natural gas AND prevent automation in the industry.

How can people reasonably expect killing jobs in renewable sectors will magically bring those jobs back?
Which is the argument for tariffs.
Exactly guys...there’s pros and negatives to every decision. But do you really think outsourcing potentially the most lucrative tech industry to the country we are competing against is a smart decision?
That doesn't make it wrong. Ad hominem has become all too common an argument technique on Reddit. 
Seems legit. Can you back this up with a credible source? 
Problem is no one is building panles in America. And if they are, they're very small and not a global partner. 
I wonder what the net differences would be between cheap Chinese panels and expensive American panels with the tax write off? 
Actually the energy source is sound.  The way we harness it is a bit disjointed.  If we can keep pushing the density and effiency of solar and start to make it in plants that use solar already the knock the carbon chain can be broken.  


The argument that the carbon chain is forever and why invest in something that needs energy that currently comes from carbon is a bit mis guided.  



We should have solar, wind , hydro, tidal, nuclear.  We should have it all.  Nuclear though should be a molten salt design to reduce safety issues of run away reactions.  


Nuclear is the base load.  Renewables day time peaks.  Battery to smooth everything out.  Not a single carbon chain used to power my tv.  This is a reality if we just make it happen.  
Suspenders look fly AF with the right outfit. Every time I wear them to work I get compliments.
Oh no shit. And try and lay down with a belt on. If I fall asleep with a belt on, I will wake up with three days of back pain. You rock those suspenders and make them popular enough so that I can wear them.
Nah they are just our hat. Hopefully it’s not a fedora :-)
JIAN YANGGG
What’s the reddit national anthem?
I'll cherish it forever.
I had the Ready Player One version of Take On Me blasting on the Bose whilst I did it.
You felt it.
Oh shit someone is holding up a fist with a glove on it! 
You do realize that capitalism is directly responsible for creating billions of lives and lifting billions of people out of poverty right?
Nothing has lifted more people out of poverty than free trade and fair competition.
Yes.  The big problem with capitalism is precisely that the invisible hand gives zero fucks about humans or humanity.
That's possible, I thought that would happen several times already and it hasn't though.  So I'm not gonna get my hopes up
I mean seriously, what else could he do? Have some prostitutes piss on him and then collude with a hostile power? Make fun of a disabled man, fail to repeal Obamacare (his base’s top priority)? Obstruct justice? Have his cabinet fall apart? Commit constant business fraud? Violate enolments? I am convinced that he really could shoot a man in Times Square and his approval rating would still hover around 35-40%
Yuuy....that's a LOT of ball-gargling.
No, he’s saying the public rationalizes slave labor when they decide when purchasing something.
The reason, of course, is likely simpler, but more inane: those industries don't want new energy, not because the workers lose jobs, but because they lose money. You could also be in a camp (like my stepfather) who probably doesn't hate the energy form of solar power itself but absolutely detests the way it is subsidized, although I think he also is not a fan of green movements in general. 
Not really. Tariffs are controlled by the government, which is beholden to the people. Upset the people, and you might find yourself kicked out of the government.
Trump only added tariffs to Chinese imports.  His goal is to keep US solar from being outsourced due to massive Chinese tariffs on US exports.
It does reduce credibility though.
I never said anything about right or wrong. I'm not going to pretend I understand international economics unlike most people in this thread. my point is: if we're crying "mob mentality," the maga mob cannot be ignored. 
It's just my thinking. I'm the only source on this I know of, although I'd doubt I'm the first to think of it.
Hey, if we can find a way to grow solar panels out of plants I don't think anyone would complain including oil companies. But currently solar panels are contributing to global emissions, not reducing them. Especially the panels manufactured in China and then shipped around the world. 

Current solar panels manufacturing has no place near wind and hydroelectric energy (as far as clean energy). If the material can change in the future than hallelujah, let's start replacing energy grids with them. The only problem today is that current solar panels contribute to global emissions. And by encouraging Chinese made products, you're encouraging climate change to increase further. Solar panels do not help the environment at all. 
Found Mork's Reddit account. 
Suck it Jian Yang!
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MK6TXMsvgQg
https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=dQw4w9WgXcQ
Fuck those other guys. [This is it.](https://youtu.be/_ReIH2fglE0)
White, Black or sequins? 
ROFLMAO. Youre mistaking human rights, social programs, technology, and democracy for capitalism. 
Those things happened despite capitalism. Not because of it. 
Unfortunately that seems to be the problem with all multi-actor systems that we have thus far devised.  Even really simple ones where both actors want a certain outcome can devolve into the worst outcome for both actors nearly every time (Prisoner's Dilemma). I don't think the ways communism has failed horribly need to be reiterated.  It unfortunately seems to be a really, really hard problem to devise incentive structures that will actually produce outcomes that align with human values.
Amen comrade 
It won't be the whole party, there will still be strongholds and their congressional reps might decide it's better to stick with him.
Midterms are not until November and the Dems have already won some red territory. We still have momentum and we just need to keep it up.
He could burn a man to death in his apartment on 5th avenue and he wouldn't lose a single vote.
Absolutely, I’m just getting tired of clearly bullshit rhetoric being so effective in our political landscape.
When you can't defend your position attack your opponent. 
They do not contribute they lower them over time.  The upfront carbon they create is off set with use many many studies have concluded.  That time to offset just gets better and better with time as efficiency increases.  

They are not as good as nuclear however they are vastly cheaper.  I would regard solar as a solid carbon off set energy source.  


I would also encourage the manufacturer of them in a carbon free plant.  Tesla is trying right now to do just that.  The pay back on the carbon is a real thing.  


China is building more solar than any other country and they could care less if they export it.  They are eating the panels they make so to speak with massive farms and stolen wind power turbine technology to go green for most of the new energy they produce. 


We however think coal is tasty and that we need to burn it all.  
You typing up 30 rebuttals to solar energy is probably wasting more carbon than a solar panel does.
Dude unless you post numbers that support your point, no one is going to believe you. Just because it takes energy to produce solar panels doesn't mean it outweighs the return over their life.
I'll take "Dating Myself" for 400, Alex!
I picked a bad sub to talk about the evils of capitalism I suppose 
Look at the 3 running as Rep in Indiana.  They keep making ad after ad for TV.  Then went from normal to every ad being about who supports Trump the most.  Showing how they each did things not in support of him.  "He's all hat".  Referring to the red hat of Trump while showing him putting it on in the video.  They know their demographic.  Party support and anti abortion.  It's sickening and pathetic.  I hate this state so much.  At least that Pence legislation was slapped down as unconstitutional.
Tariffs are a drag on the world economy. Literally economics 101. I don't like a lot of stuff on the more 'liberal' subreddits either but their sources that they often follow are scary. Alex Jones, Sean Hannity and Fox News in general are examples and they are not credible sources. So if that's where they get a lot of their 'news' and information from, I do believe it detracts from their own credibility. I would not argue to write this guy off without some thought or research but the_donalds sources are beyond biased.
I believe the problem is the OP is discussing pollution while everyone else is hyper focused on carbon emission.  

[https://news.nationalgeographic.com/news/energy/2014/11/141111-solar-panel-manufacturing-sustainability-ranking/](Fabricating the panels requires caustic chemicals such as sodium hydroxide and hydrofluoric acid, and the process uses water as well as electricity, the production of which emits greenhouse gases.) Once you get past the pollution from production there are years of clean  energy.  Then a pile of e-waste.

We don’t notice the impact because solar is really tiny now.  But if we mass produce enough to replace all carbon energy we will realize we are replacing global warming with rivers of toxic waste.   

Overall the biggest bang for the buck is nuclear.  Small frame units can provide more energy with far less environmental impact.



https://youtu.be/IvQf3zHX4cQ

https://youtu.be/TqVRNupPmNI
Yeah unfortunately downvotes on anticap sentiments roll hard outside of LSC and FullCom
You didn’t talk about the evils of capitalism. There are so many valid critiques and interesting things to say on the subject but you went with a low-effort comment that doesn’t even make sense in context. Capitalism has a pretty good track record as compared to other forms of government we’ve tried sinply because it allows people to value humams and humanity in the deals they choose to make, while also legally protecting property rights and human life.

Of course, you could pointed out how it often doesn’t work out, how it could be improved, how mixing capitalism with politics often leads to perversely distorted results, or any of the thousands of other interesting critiques, but instead you went with something silly and blamed the subreddit.
You picked a bad reality to talk about the evils of capitalism when all alternatives seem to do a great job of stifling human advancement and causing far more deaths per capita.
Damn, had to search this far down to find a reasonable comment with sources backing it. I commend you my good xir! 
I agree with your sentiment, but global warming and everyone that tries to ignore or fight it, are a direct result of capitalism. It has the potential to kill billions of people and people with a capitalistic mindset are perfectly willing to ignore it if it means they can make more money.
Human rights, democracy, separation of power. and social programs have done more to lift people out of poverty. Funny how as capitalism gains prominence over those things we are sliding backwards. 
